I also participated in the Colorado Art Education Association’s Art Show that was on Santa Fe Drive in Denver for the month of April. Found #3 was on display along with many spectacular works of art created by art educators throughout the state of Colorado. Being that this was a juried show with many submissions, I was excited my painting was selected.
I probably overdid it a bit though. In the morning I led a small group of people around St James’s discovering Gentleman’s Westminster. I then grabbed a quick sandwich from M&S and boarded the District Line to Richmond where I promptly fell asleep!
Oh, and the acting in this movie is awful, I mean awful. Nobody in this movie is any good. The chick playing Joey is just terribly bland and unconvincing, reciting every line like she’s reading it on a cue card. Is this really the best actress they could get? The Hulk Hogan lookalike who follows her around is somehow even less convincing. But on the other end of the spectrum, the girl playing Teresa over-emotes everything and acts like she’s on crack the entire time. I can’t even decide which one is worse!
The word death in this passage is the Greek word “θανατος” or “thánatos.” This word can refer to all three forms of death; the first being spiritual death, which is separation from God (Ephesians 1:1,2;4:18). The second form of death is physical death (Hebrews 9:27). The third form of death is the second death (Revelation 20:11-15). All three forms of death entered into the world and the human race through the fall in Genesis 3. Paul emphasizes this horrible truth in v12 saying, “death came to to all men inasmuch as all sinned” The Greek word Paul used here for “sinned” is “ημαρτον” or “hamartánõ” It means, “to sin, to miss; one who keeps missing the mark in his relationship to God.” It is clear that all men have “hamartánõ” because they have the sin nature that they inherited from Adam whose fall allowed ”hamartía” into the world. Because of this, mankind is plagued by “thánatos.”
Interpol is now actively involved as are most of the world’s intelligence agencies because they believe the trail in this case will lead eventually to the World Economic Forum, the UN and a group of Oligarchs who have been plotting to create a fascistic world government. These Oligarchs have also been trying to start World War 3 and carry out an unprecedented genocide of two thirds of the world’s population.
We figured it if was good enough for ducks...it was good enough for Wadley's.
This has been such a hot, hot summer already. Especially hot since we're following a ridiculously snowy winter! Usually I love to be outside and exploring during the spring and summer, but this has been brutal! During one of the first bad weekends that we had, we headed over to the Greek festival. The food and entertainment there was amazing! The sweaty walk from Harbor East to Greektown was not. The good thing about these little walks that we take is that we always end up passing restaurants that we've been wanting to try. On this outing, we passed G & A Restaurant.
The all-by-hand spring wallhanging! So far the quilting is going swimmingly, especially now that I have my glider chair in a location with excellent light and I can quilt very comfortably. It would be fabulous to have the spring wallhanging up during springtime!
During Women SS2012 Fashion week in Paris, Sonia Rykiel welcomed her guests into a location strongly dominated by a thick yellow lined catwalk, reminding me of the "Yellow Brick Road" from The Wonderful Wizard of Oz.
Location: Mexico City, Mexico
Consider the story of one family of illegal immigrants described in the Spring 2005 Journal of American Physicians and Surgeons:
With a point and shoot.
The ghosts return to noise.
Filling: sprinkle gelatin over milk in a small bowl and let stand 2 minutes to soften. In an electric mixer, with the wire attachment, beat together cream cheese, eggs, salt, gelatin mixture and vanilla until well combined, about 2 minutes, then stir in dulce de leche gently but thoroughly. Pour filling over crust, smoothing top, then bake in a hot water bath in oven until center is just set, about 45 minutes. Cool cheesecake completely in pan on rack, about 2 hours. Chill, covered, at least 6 hours.
Must I abstain from those
In Chemistry I literally almost fell asleep during my teacher’s lecture. It was that boring.
OCCUPATIONS – Male workers were multi-skilled and worked in more than one occupations, such as the two firemen, who also worked in the field the 94 males when groups according to occupation revealed the community of practice to which they belonged. In their occupational group or community of practice, deeper and further analys is the the divere range of knowledge, skills and experiences African workers brought to the Caribbean workplace were identified, described and explained. Grouped in their community of practice the workers were qualitatively and statistically analysed in terms of name, age, place of birth and occupational roles and responsibilities. The list below shows the findings of the analysis.
It's *FRIDAY*!!!! Oh gosh, I can't even tell you how excited I am that it's finally *here*!
In addition to misunderstanding dominion as domination, I believe we have also become exploiters rather than servants of creation, because of a perspective popularized in the last century suggesting that at the end of all things we will be taken up (or raptured) to heaven and the earth will be destroyed.[3] I would submit to you that this notion misinterprets the biblical witness, and is a key factor in our lack of care and concern for creation. Think about it, if this world ultimately will be burned up and destroyed who cares what happens to it? What we do in or to or with creation does not matter at all if this view is correct. I do not believe it is, but I do believe it does foster a lackadaisical, complacent (and thus, destructive) attitude toward creation.
The Shop Around The Corner (1940) ... TCM ... 12 AM
Remain unmoved, stubborn and unrelenting.
The trouble with this parable is in the assumption that we know who Jesus is speaking to (‘those who were confident in their own righteousness’) and the assigning of roles. This is exactly what we must not do with this parable. It’s too easy to do so. It’s too easy to know exactly who is the publican and who is the sinner and the minute we start assigning roles we have ceased being a player (either a publican or a tax-collector) and started being the one who justifies one and not the other (i.e., God). It is only God who justifies and therefore only God who can assign roles.
Design must be new
Let It Be
Soon it’ll start melting faster than you expect it to. At this stage, begin stirring gently with a wooden spatula. Switch to medium-low heat for better control of the fire.
melt
Chapter 1 - Plate Tectonics
I am selling my Nikon D50. No, I am not quitting taking photos or anything. I have a new camera. A Nikon D3000 with a new 50mm 1.8 and Tamron's 18-270mm. My new camera, the motor is not in the body anymore, so my old lenses won't work with it.
If I had an emergency come up right now I would have a hard time getting as many words written as I would like.
Parties are great at revealing our inner minds to ourselves. My mind is currently asking whether I have anything relevant to say in a world that, despite being not much younger, feels like lightyears away. And with degree show just around the corner what better time than now to answer that question.
"I’ve just been to the Tea Farms in the clouds above Ripple. Nice place, smells all leafy but it can also dye your hair green. And your pants. Oops."
There's another reason why I haven't been blogging lately. I was embroidering almost everyday for 2 months straight.
The Bolton News has now learned that Kirkpatrick has launched an appeal against his conviction and will next be due up in court on December 14.
Grade: 8.2 - SIMGEssential
Are just about everywhere
We start with you and your most talented managers and focus on the leadership skills. We then support you with formulating an authentic vision and mission statement. We coach you on implementing the chosen strategy. We don’t produce lively reports, we do produce results. We are non-judgmental, future focused and action oriented. Concrete, no-nonsense, measurable. That is the Dutch Coach Approach.
On August 23, 1974, you made a promise to me. You promised to take me, to have me and to hold me from that day forward, for better or for worse, for richer or for poorer, in sickness and in health, to love me and to cherish me, until death do us part.
I said with a sigh
Using one of those dismissive hand gestures they teach in cop school, he indicated he had something to say.
Apart from the scheduled venues there'll be tons going on all over the site.
Dr. Seuss' How the Grinch Stole Christmas ... Cartoon Network (east) ... 8 PM
D. Symptoms must be present in early childhood (but may not become fully manifest until social demands exceed limited capacities).
The controversy started when Marc J. Fink reported on the issue at Islamist-Watch.org on April 19. Best Buy chose to react, not by admitting fault, but by inferring that the criticism is motivated by intolerance.
Thanks, again, to all those who took part, or facilitated the service in any way.
That is GENOCIDE!
This repeatedly-used distinction between ‘ordinary Muslims’ and ‘fringe groups’ etc. also doesn’t hold water. What Burke is essentially saying is something very simple: Most Muslims are not active Muslims (or Islamists) in the political sense of ‘active’. But that is true of the Conservative Party, New Labour and just about every other political and religious group. Of course it is the case that most people are not politically active. This does not stop the non-active from supporting the active members or stop them from believing in the same things as the activists. No one says that X is ‘not a proper Conservative’ because ‘he doesn’t attend the annual conference or attend local party meetings’. He or she is still a Conservative. Similarly, what’s to stop a Muslim, or very many Muslims, supporting Islamists, or even terrorists, even though they spend most of their time running their shops or watching TV? There are only a few politically active members of all religious and political faiths or organisations. That’s just the way it is. One only needs a few activists to bring about many radical changes to society. Thus the IRA, for example, was a very small group. It had, nonetheless, very many non-active supporters. Similarly, Islamists do not need thousands of people on the streets every day or even thousands of members of the Islamist parties. As long as the average Muslim condones the bombings of Hamas, Hezbollah and the like, as well as the increased Islamisation of the UK, then he or she does not need to be active. It is enough that they support, however tacitly, the Islamists and the terrorists. This is all that is required. Again, the IRA had a large support among nearly all Nationalists. That support was largely made up of completely non-active Nationalists. Incidentally, what kind of ‘extremist behaviour’, exactly, is Burke looking for from these ‘mainstream Muslims’? Even Islamists and terrorists are hardly likely to display ‘extremist behaviour’ to all and sundry. No, most Muslims in the UK get on with their lives in a pretty normal way. So too did the mass of supporters of the IRA. Even the most supporters of Hamas today are not politically active (as can be said about New Labour’s supporters, etc.).
Additionally,reactor 4 was severely damaged even before the typhoon.
The corners of Bryan’s mouth turned up into a smile. “Maybe just water will do Mara…and your last name?” He held out his hand once more.
I love that I’ve met so many wonderful people – activists, friends, authors, chefs – those who share my love for veganism but they are another bonus. I’m not vegan so I can make friends, gather fans or be part of some exclusive club. It’s NOT about my social life; it’s about the animals.
While women have many books to call upon that offer advice about dealing with life’s twists and turns, men often do not. What, for example can men do to cope with the loss of a wife? The Widower’s Toolbox: Repairing Your Life After Losing Your Spouse ($14.95, New Horizon Press, softcover) by Gerald J. Schaefer joined with Tom Bekkers, MSW, APSW, to provide an excellent guide for grieving men that sets them on the path to healing. Schaefer draws on his 26-year career experience managing people and dealing with many of the issues facing him and his young sons after the loss of his wife to breast cancer. Bekkers is a licensed psychotherapist and advanced practice social worker with twenty years experience in professional counseling. Together they provide a wealth of information and advice on such things as organizing household tasks, resolving issues that prevent healing, handling children’s special needs, and learning to love again. Robert Rodi has penned a hilarious and heartwarming memoir, Dogged Pursuit: How a Rescue Dog Rescued Me ($15.00, Plume, softcover). It is an account of a year in the dog show world that is filled with outsize personalities, lots of laughs, and the unforgettable bond that was forged between himself and an unlikely, loveable teammate. When he began training his Sheltie, Carmen, in canine agility, he had no idea what lay ahead. He soon caught the competitive bug and when Carmen was sidelined with a hip injury, he went looking for a new dog to take to the competitions. His choice was a surprising one; a scrawny, scruffy rescue dog that alternated between Cujo-like aggression at home and possum-like paralysis in the ring. Dusty had a talent for finding ways to do things wrong, but by then they have bonded in ways that taught Rodi some valuable lessons. The author owns three dogs and has authored seven novels. This may turn out to be his favorite book and, if you love dogs, is likely to become yours as well. Halfway to Heaven: My White-Knuckled—and Knuckleheaded—Quest for the Rocky Mountain High by Mark Obmascik ($15.00, Free Press, an imprint of Simon and Schuster, softcover) is the story of a man who joined the more than half million people who attempt to climb one of Colorado’s 54 mountains over 14,000 feet high. A stay-at-home father of three in Denver, he never thought he would become one of them, but when his 12-year-old son, Cass, called home from his Colorado summer camp, ecstatic about climbing Pike’s Peak, Obmascik found an activity they could enjoy together. He tells the story of his outrageous midlife adventure in this memoir of taking off for the mountains at the weekend’s early dawn to huff and puff his way toward climbing every one of the 14,000 foot mountains. Men will identify with this delightful story.
So one of the request Mom had was to do tea when we're in NY. I searched, I swear. The first ones came to mind for tea in NY as an out-of-town person would be the Russian Tea Room, Palm Court in the Plaza Hotel. While those are definitely a once in a lifetime experience, we also don't want to be tied down by reservations.
Pretty Girls Make Graves certainly had an interesting premise: the story of a young woman’s life being told through the voices of legendary women like Medusa, Rapunzel and Kalypso. Unfortunately, these women rarely speak up, so we are stuck in the point of view of the main character, Justine. Justine is not in any way sympathetic or even particularly interesting. She whines about missing Jason, hooks up (but doesn’t necessarily have sex) with every being with a Y chromosome she can get her hands on and drinks ad nauseum—quite literally. Did I mention that she breaks men’s hearts for fun and has no redeeming qualities whatsoever? I can understand ruthless women, like Thu from House of Dreams, but even she had redeeming qualities. Justine? Not so much.
I ate my way through every different flavor, duck, roast pork and buk choi, mushroom, pumpkin, prawn and chives, tofu, and the tasty siu my.
TIP #6
It is about society too. Why do we allow ourselves as a country to be completely bombarded by foreign propaganda? Why? You know today’s young Nigerians have their teams in Man-united and Chelsea, they don’t remember one local club’s name not to talk of their players.
For years strange tales of a monster living on a remote Indonesian island circulated throughout the East Indies. Official interest was sparked in the early 1910s by stories from Dutch sailors. The creature was allegedly a "dragon" which inhabited a small island in the Lesser Sunda Islands. The fire breathing creature was reported to be seven meters long.
What? Excuse me? Am I dead? Am I hearing right?
Water would have no place
Anyway, all's fair in love and blog war and I am not going to worry about how I got there - I just got there!
132 Spring Street
I chose prior focuses, such as "the continuum concept" and "attachment parenting," for similar reasons. Where Western culture expects parents to use day care and school to exclude children from adult activities, CC and AP show a way of life that includes children as integral. I have children. Whether or not they're present with me, they're an inseparable part of my life.
"The approach is very much about who they are behind the masks and how they interact together and how these personalities mix," explains Johns, DC Entertainment's chief creative officer. "With the world's greatest superheroes, how does that team actually work? Do they all get along? Being able to pull together and see how that relationship is forged and continues to grow has to be at the heart of that book."
Cardiovascular training has been the poster girl of every good exercise regimen for the last 50 years or so. Just go to any local gym and the sheer volume of chrome cardiovasuclar equipment on display is astonishing.
13 - Your great-grandparents' anniversary
“You’ve got to be proactive in preparing for extreme weather,” she said.
Likud Party: Winner
Saturday the children were getting "squirrelly" being cooped up so we took advantage of the snow to hit "murder mountain" the name kids have given the local hill. Retrieved sleds from the garden shed and hit the slopes so to speak.
People tend to “fake” traits that are socially desirable if the cost of faking is relatively low. Travel encourages this faking more than most characteristics. It’s easy to see why travel is socially desirable. First, it signals activity, and activity is preferable to inactivity. Travelers backpack, hike, climb, and explore. Second, it signals openness and curiosity. The traveler is interested in cultures other than his own. Third, a love of travel indicates a love of novelty. The traveler has eaten exotic foods or seen exotic animals. Fourth, travel perpetuates the feelings of being in an elite in-group, which is nauseatingly manifested in tired conversations about cities that both travelers have visited*: “Wasn’t Prague beautiful?!” “It was!” and then there is the obligatory listing of the mutual places that each of the travelers visited in said city.** This conversation generally will give both participants a lot of pleasure, sometimes even generating a sort of insular arrogance. People who don’t engage in this self-congratulatory ritual—like my former professor—will be greeted with condescension, the result being that these anti-travel individuals are hesitant to express their preferences in public settings.
But this time, I want to do something else - so - you see that button there on the left? For the next few weeks, any money donated to the PayPal account will go to Lauren and Elie to help them begin their new home, their new lives. They got many presents in Israel and I'm sure that even now, as they are together in the United States celebrating their marriage with Lauren's wonderful family, I bet they are getting more.
Do you see the difference here? This is what I'm endlessly yammering about when I say "pare away everything you don't need." You don't need any of the stuff I struck out; your query is tighter and the level of tension ratchets up.
In stark contrast to these delicate collages Campbell has created a series of dramatically enlarged found images which have been UV printed onto powder coated aluminium; titled For I have known them all already, known them all # 1-6. Each image, selected from a travel guide has then been rephotographed by Campbell and then almost entirely removed to leave an aperture surrounded by a the white margins of the publication page and a small border of abstract colour and shape that relates more to the history of abstract painting than to the photographic source.
Anyway, I just wanted to get that off my chest..... strange I know!!
But that other recent craze - using white gloves - can bring disaster. Although they may be required when handling some objects which are particularly vulnerable to fingermarks or human sweat, the idea peddled by the film-makers that they are an essential tool when consulting written archives is crackers.
My cleavage was migrating dangerously close to my toes..........
Pretend he’s Parson Brown? Is that like Burnt Sienna, or Raw Umber? They can make a brown snowman. They don’t have to pretend. Someone should make a brown snowman.
» 11/18 – Atlanta, GA @ Philips Arena
You reach out to me
-Simplicity: garlic, onions and peppers
And to those of you who were visited by Irene: I hope you’re alright. I’ve been thinking about you.
I tell you, don’t dwell on these little imperfections. I have been there. And there’s nothing worst that you can do to yourself than to wish yourself away… To wish you were someone else. Because that’s when insecurity all begins.
Overprotected and signed Tshirt.
And when you do, you will be that much closer to living life on your terms.
Didn't we both agree you'd never grow up
*38% water content
Confirmation of the daring raid first leaked out not from American press accounts but via Japanese newspapers. Many American media outlets on April 18 reported that the raid had taken place but that it had not yet been confirmed by either political or military leaders. The location from which the Raiders launched was shrouded in mystery, and FDR, questioned by reporters three days later, refused to shed light on the situation.
When seasoning the dish I kept it simple, salt, pepper, garlic and onion powder. Powder?? Yes, powder. I used garlic and onion powder fairly often, in specific dishes, mostly because I like the way they perform in some ways. In dips, sauces and dressings the powders are great because you don't get a sharp bite that you can get from fresh garlic and onions. I like it in marinades too, as the garlic powder won't burn like fresh garlic will. The main reason you'll see me use onion powder or dehydrated onions in place of fresh is because my Witchy Sissy has an onion allergy, poor thing, and can't have fresh onions. Powdered or dehydrated is fine, however. So when I know she'll be eating a dish I'll use the powdered stuff. In the case of this gratin I used it for 2 reasons: I wanted a light flavor of onion, this is a squash gratin, not an onion one and I feared a fresh onion would overpower the squashs' delicate flavor. And 2, my Sissy was going to be eating it. 'Nuff said! The simple seasonings really highlighted the flavors of the squash and cheese resulting in a delicious side dish that makes me excited to pull more zucchini and crooked neck squash out of the garden. Thank you, gratin!
What is this NTC revival plan for Mumbai?
No sale date has been set, but it will be soon.
DW: Oh my gosh!
Welcome to your 1st stop along the Paper Secrets Holiday Blog Hop.
Currently only heterosexual couples are permitted to get married in Britain, while civil partnerships, introduced in 2005, are limited to same-sex couples.
While life’s dark maze I tread,
Prosit!
My beastmen are not on hold, they are still working as a side project
It was at this point of the song when I was writing it that these words just came spilling out:
Jay and Silent Bob Strike Back
Food is at the core of what it means to be human, to be alive.
Spend at least 250 words talking about your strategies on getting through. And then share them here, so others can learn from your experience. Who knows, you might learn something too.
Wall and book: E41E42, E31, E33
Women – love make ups.
shot up into the dark so perpendicular
If God ordained the Apostle Paul as the spokesperson of His grace, what do we do with the Old Testament prophets and the twelve Apostles?
or religion
Edam
In April 2011, the United States Bankruptcy Court for the Eastern District of Michigan will begin to make digital audio files of court proceedings available to the public over the internet through the PACER system.
Notes: Take no more than 5 heavy attempts.
I guess the storefront censors were running out of people to ban and needed a new interpretation of the rules to include more trivial shit. I’ve been painting in Forza for almost 5 years now and this is the first time I’ve heard of business phone numbers being a bad thing. There’s a big difference between putting 1-800-GO-FedEx on a FedEx cargo van and adding “call Molly 854-4533 for a good time” to a random car. First should be acceptable, second clearly not.
When it comes to the rule of the bag, bring the lightest and smallest bag you can keep close to your body as much as possible. It will be an extra worry if you have two kilos of belongings hurting your shoulders or back. If you’re like me who is expected to bring a laptop to work, then use an open or zipped tote bag with outside pockets where you can slide in your MRT card, your sunnies, a lip balm, and some coins. Avoid wearing backpacks, since it’s more prone to snatching incidents. It’s also a disturbance to the other passengers because it takes a lot of space in the train.
set noexec_user_stack=1
Makes ones little sad heart bleed.
My husband described them as, "Not beautiful, but they taste pretty good". They turned out crumbly but moist. I even did a double take this morning and had a couple left over from last night with butter and jam spread on them...all I can say is mmmmm!
… even as the person in charge, the one with authority, you can ultimately influence people only to the extent they are willing to be influenced by you. And that willingness will depend on whether they trust you. … As the boss, you can demand compliance but you must earn commitment, and the coin of that realm is trust. … As we explore this topic with managers, we find it’s a subject both familiar and unfamiliar. Most people don’t know how to think about it constructively. Why?
Golden Ear
i'm hungry....
As a bright young couple she and Tom were unstoppable. Endlessly busy, and productive and floating high on a cloud of achievement. They had known an exciting planting season when seeds of hope had been liberally strewn and tender shoots admired. Their garden was cherished and grew well to form a strong and admirable surround to their beautiful home; interesting jobs; lively circle of friends and inevitably glittering social life.
When Jesus saw how the temple was being used he was naturally angry. Those who were coming faithfully to worship were finding themselves in a market, not a temple, where merchants and money changers were able to make a profit from their need to present perfect animals for sacrifice and to use the correct coinage. It’s understandable that those who benefited from the arrangement in the temple were also angry and wanted to know what right Jesus had to drive everyone out.
I hate election day. I used to love it. I used to feel like my vote made a difference, and maybe it does. But I hate it now because I have to deal with these people...and they affect my every day life. And I don't like it. I really think that every single person in America should work in the media for one election season...and see what these people are like. It's a real eye opener.
Please, don’t congratulate me, I’ve gotten into graduate school. I know what you are thinking, “How dare she spit in the face of such a wonderful opportunity” and other declarations of how ashamed I should be. Well there is no need for all that shaming business I am already utterly abashed. I feel like a drug addict who has just taken taken her “last” hit of heroine or huff of paint thinner before quitting for good. In my case, the drug is school.
Kasey puts the K in StalKer.
Last week I was at one of Griffins activities with him, and another Mom there was wearing (at 9:30am) heavy gold sparkly eyeliner. With her gym clothes.
For the Spirit God gave us does not make us timid, but gives us power, love and self-discipline. II Timothy 1:7
Nothing is easy about caring for two little ones. It's frightening knowing that you are in complete control of their lives. You and you alone.
Don’t pretend you’re not jealous…
that bans the last of winter’s dearth:
Well if you’re writing about a high level lifestyle in your music, you want something that conveys that it’s real. A lot of those diamonds that you’re talking about on those artists are not real. I’m going to be honest with you, they put it on as a part of their presentation. Not all of them are blessed with the same level of success that would allow them all to have it, but it’s something that you consistently see within the culture. And it’s cool because you can’t say, “Well he has it and I don’t so I’m not as important as he is.”
It was nine years ago today; the hottest June ever in Austin.
So, we touched on the glutes earlier. Do you remember what happens to them? That’s right – they weaken and lengthen. Whilst they’re doing this, your poor hip flexors at the front of your hips are busy getting tighter and tighter as your pregnancy develops, to accommodate baby bump at your front. So, again, this is another area of the body that needs some attention when it comes to stretching or cool down. If you sit down a lot, your hip flexors are in a state of contraction, so stretching these muscles out really helps bring your pelvis back into alignment again. Remember with any stretch, you don’t want to hold it for more than 10-15 seconds; don’t bounce or jerk; and remember to breathe.
No. The explanation for the length of the sponge-stick has to do with the design of Roman toilets. Romans were very civilized and in first century Rome, if you were caught short, you would have had a choice of 144 public latrines. Including one in the forum where the 'patrons' could sit and look out through columns at people strolling in the forum. And the people could look right back at them!
.... of a London Bus - no not the big behind (well that could be debatable!!) no the reason is that you can wait and wait and wait and then two come along at once!! This is my second post of the day (so do scroll down to see the first one!) - and the reason... well I just had to join in with this week's Less is More challenge which is Week 64 - How Charming....
Does everyone know that a lot of the Simpson characters are named after streets in Portland? Maybe not everyone, but just in case, the Oregonian has a fun article filling in the lines.
Fahey that is equal parts all of the above mentioned styles, lifted and
I also love to pick up a pencil and create fantasy art, so plan to use one night a week for each of the different types of art/craft I love to create and hopefully will see my creative side develop and my depression decrease as I get the emotions out (although I am currently exercising them out, it doesn’t seem to be working well enough!).
1) Stainless steel or glass bowl (to collect grated pineapples)
different times. I keep one in the normal carrier (for use when I'm running the chest carrier), one in my plate carrier, and one in my ruck. While I've heard rumors of Camelbacks exploding and sending water down some forlorn GIs back, I've never experienced or witnessed it (although, I have seen lesser brands suffer from this). I've been carrying a Camelback since the mid-1990s, even before they were officially authorized for use in the Ranger Regiment. I've jumped them during airborne operations, fast-roped out of helicopters with them, and thrown them out of the backs of trucks and Humvees. I've NEVER seen one burst (the sad reality is, the only drawback I've ever suffered with Camelbacks is my propensity to fill the bladder with Kool-Aid or Gatorade, and forget about it so long the shit goes bad, and I play hell getting them clean on the inside of the tube).
The artists:
We looked left and right.
Canadians not personable? I don't think so! Maybe you and I can chat about it sometime?
Ohhh lake living is my heaven!
I hope all moms had a wonderful mother's day and/or spoiled their moms rotten! I had a wonderful day yesterday with finally some good weather (which is very relative of course, but not getting rain nowadays is considered good weather:-). I went with hubby and son to watch the dancing performance of the two nieces and after that hubby took us out for late lunch/early diner at the riverside.
A bottle of Spanish cider (Escanciador Extra Sider, $7) is light and sweet and the perfect accompaniment to lunch. On tap there are three different draught beers from 4 Pines ($7-$8) with bottled beers including Franziskaner Wiessbier (Germany, $9 for 500ml), Stiegl premium lager (Austria, $7.50), Monteith's black beer (New Zealand, $7.50), Dalgety Red ale (Australia, $9) and Dalgety smoked porter (Australia, $9.50).
The dominant defenders: Pepe, Sergio Ramos, Marcelo, Coentrão, Albiol, Arbeloa.
Since I work with very little planning, this was a sticky bit for me because I needed to remember to record what I was doing without interrupting the flow of ideas. My inner engineer (aka Stewie) came up with a couple of systems to help me with this part. Sticky notes really are brilliant!
1)As I said earlier, I normally run a race during this time of the year
each one was destined to where he once sailed
Title I
Hi you all! hope you are well... I am stuck in london, my flight was cancelled because of the snow.. every year there will be a little bit of snow, and every time people are just as surprised and unprepared.. jeez..
Well, now you're thinking of doing something drastic about it — something to her, that is. Even if your pain and humiliation are the last goddamn things she ever feels in her life. You're gonna make her regret ever recasting your former role in her life. And now, you find yourself in a diner on Sunset, meeting with some shady guy who takes her headshot from you and gives you a key and tells you where it will be. When it's "all done." After which, you find yourself suicidal with regret and you end up recasting your unpleasant reality as a cinematic fever dream in which you're a star on the rise, in which anyone who ever held dominion over you in your waking hours is now the picture of powerlessness, in which you and your Sapphic beau embark upon a quest to discover her hidden identity and fall madly in love — forever and ever and ever and ever. Just like people in the movies.
You may have visited the lovely blog, Campfire Chic, but I have only recently “discovered” Kam’s wonderful and inspiring blog (if you haven’t visited as of yet, be sure to do so, it is chock full of coolness!). She has monthly sponsors, and for April, one of the sponsors is Indie Chic, a shop of the most feminine and darling flower and other nature jewelry. And yours truly won a pack of this awesome jewelry!! My girls are going to totally fight me for the joy of wearing these lovelies, lol.
""Everyone has heard of YOUR obedience,
-Milan Kundera
All last week I helped my Husband with the decor for his Mother Daughter Tea event that took place on Saturday. The theme was Breakfast At Tiffany's. My Husband likes to keep the budget for decorations low, yet still wants it to be cute. Thank goodness he has a wife(Me) to help him out! I love the challenge.
It is not the advertising of these products that the food faddists at Sustain find intolerable, but the products themselves. For them, a display ban at the point-of-sale would be step forward, but "the next logical step" would inevitably follow. And, in fairness to them, it is a perfectly logical and consistent progression now that the idiot politicians have decided that (a) children shouldn't see "unhealthy" food, and (b) it is appropriate for the state to intervene.
It made me realize that our getaways over the past couple of years have been fun but busy. We come back refreshed and full of fun memories but still tired. We go somewhere and we have an agenda, a plan, a list of things to see and do and experience.
person to give you a whole lot of background information. All I do
Matcha Mochi Mini Cake
Pours deep yellow with a huge pillowy tan head, with good carbonation that's some of the slowest I've ever seen in a beer. The slow rise of the bubbles belies the clarity of this beer, and indicates that it may actually have some body despite what looks like more filtration than I've ever seen in a tripel.
First of all, Happy Labor Day weekend to everyone!
With backpacks and gas lamps
And again, much like the doomed Tatars who are about to fall from centuries of power over half of Asia, I have fallen off to another nap.
Then I got into the cab.
2010.08.06 Iraq Baghdad 2 13 Two civilians are blown to bits by Jihadi bombers.
Malnourished mothers often give birth to underweight babies who are 20 per cent more likely to die before the age of five. Up to 17 million children are born underweight every year. (Source: A World Fit for Children, UNICEF, 2007).
I should not be satisfied with the legislation which you suggest. I feel that it would only be tinkering with what is really becoming a fundamental problem for us all, though it is only beginning to push its ugly head above the surface of politics. The figures which we have been given make it clear that we are faced with a problem which, though at at present it may be only a cloud the size of a man’s hand, may easily come to fill the whole political horizon! Indeed, if something is not done to check it now, I should not be at all surprised if the problem became quite unmanageable in twenty or thirty years time. We might well be faced with very much the same type of appalling issue that is now causing such great difficulties for the United States. The main causes of this sudden inflow of blacks is of course the Welfare State. So long as the antiquated rule obtains that any British subject can come into this country without any limitation at all, these people will pour in to take advantage of our social services and other amenities and we shall have no protection at all.
In 1997 she joined the House of Lords as Baroness Rendell of Babergh. She is now an octogenarian with no signs of slowing down. Rendell’s books fall into three categories: the Wexford mysteries (see my post on End in Tears), the stand-alone mysteries, and those written under the pseudonym, Barbara Vine (see my post on The Minotaur). The Rottweiler is one of her most engaging stand-alone novels, “especially sure-handed” according to Janet Maslin of The New York Times.
This cute Sugar Nellie stamp is called "Butterfly Girl," and she's one of the "Simply Sassy" stamps sold at Funky Kits. Uh oh...I couldn't find her in the store just now, so she must be out of stock at the moment...aacck! Sorry about that...but do check out the rest of Krista Smith's creations in rubber available HERE at Funky Kits. Would you like a peek at the inside?
I think that I could go on indefinately about how great this game is but I won’t because if you don’t have this game I don’t want you to waste anymore time reading my rubbish when you should be playing Trials Evolution. It’s the best game on the Xbox Live market place right now offering a massive range of game modes, customization options and a level of challenge thyat will keep you coming back for more.
While browsing through the google images, I saw some beautiful dappled gray horses. I figured the third horse would be fun to color as a dappled gray. However, most dappled horses are a cool, steel-gray rather than a warm gray, which is what I did my base tones in. Not a problem. As I mentioned before, if you layer enough color over the top, you can push base colors out of the way, so I happily went to town with my cool grays and totally ignored the base of warm grays except as a shadow reference.
Focus Adjustment: Inner focusing system with USM & full-time manual
I then made my own heart shape and partially embossed this with the Cuttlebug Roses folder. I inked the raised area with Tattered Rose and partially stamped on the rose design with the crimson ink. I inked round the edge with violet ink.
i'm happy i'm me
11. Forest Fire - Fortune Teller (2:15)
Affect the behavior of a physical object — for example, the behavior of an otherwise random device. Make wise and fortuitous choices that direct them toward their goals.
prize for a poem (of up to 42 lines).
Both my grandmothers have been pillars of model mothers too. I have watched as my parents both rise up and call their mothers blessed...and their husbands praise them...just as the verse says. I have watched the love my grandmothers have for their children and grandchildren. I know the memories and special moments each have made with us. I heard the stories of my parents' childhoods...and how my grandmothers made each moment special and memorable. I am blessed to have loved and been my Nonnie's granddaughter. I am blessed to still be able to talk, visit, shop, and laugh with my Maw Maw. I am thankful for the examples they both set for me as I look to become a good mother.
The kids really seem to dig the uber-legit personalized feature of having their name printed on the test:
Then we get a little bit of depth when Moo Yul’s favorite teammate, Dong Soo, is told that his contract won’t be renewed because the only reason he got one the previous year was that they thought his warm, friendly personality would be good for the team. Ouch.
Fortunately, everything went very well, everything was done on time. There were some minor glitches such as the catering didn't have a dessert plate, all they had was China plates for the entree, I freaked out. They finally came with a backup plan and although we had to settle with less, I was happy to have a plate for my dessert at least :).
I love this card just as much I think...hahahahaha. The striped paper is again from the Glitz Paper - Laced with Grace. The butterflies and flourish are MFT die-namics too and again a flower from my stash. Add a bit of lace, a banner with sentiment and some sticklers to the little butterfly and middle flower (not that you can see in the photo) and card number 2 is complete.
‘Love cannot be forced, ordered, or made obligatory. It is necessarily free. If God liberates, it is because he expects and hopes that we will come to know him and love him. He cannot lead us to do so by terrorizing us.’
In the study, Diffenbaugh and Ashfaq used two dozen climate models to project what could happen in the U.S. if increased carbon dioxide emissions raised the Earth's temperature by 1.8 degrees Fahrenheit (1 degree Celsius) between 2010 and 2039 – a likely scenario, according to the International Panel on Climate Change.
Purity of conduct constitutes the purity of the mind. The purity that one attains by ablutions in sacred waters is regarded as inferior.
As I and a lot of economists, some of them Nobel laureates, have been pointing out, America’s biggest problem NOW is not the deficit. It is lack of consumer demand, which is caused by joblessness. Deep, extended joblessness. In such an environment, cutting deficits, particularly by cutting spending, is only going to make matters worse.
Here is what we experienced as Dean and I diverged on our hike to get different perspectives.
May just wants to be loved. After being rejected by the two people who showed her a bit of attention things tend to go wrong.
Published in the Big Issue In The North, 29 December 2011
Fishery Sciences 203
Sunday morning saw the stranded daughters arrive home in a mish mash of clothing after discarding their flimsy going out frocks and heels and swapping them for a selection of sweatshirts and suitable footwear for the long trek home and my Pucci Wellington Boots got their annual outing as long time readers of the Blog will already know, these beauties come out every year for either snow or torrential downpours. I always think of them as an investment purchase even though they only cost about £65 at the time , but it was most probably about 6 years ago now that they made their way into my net-a-porter shopping basket. I can't see them ever wearing out which means, I probably won't ever get a pair of Hunters but I can lust after the black glossy ones I got my eldest for Christmas, I love them and I think she made the right choice putting the glossy ones on her wish list, they are gorgeous with or without the Hunter socks which accessorise them perfectly!
What this means is that Yi Gak gets to be devastated by her departure.
B-rad has tried his hand at Zentangling a few times, but when he saw that the challenge from a few weeks ago was to do a spiral with his favourite tangle, Paradox, he had to give it a go. Isn't it AWESOME!??
It found that companies whose CEOs’ compensation exceeded reported tax expense in 2010 had average global profits of $1.9 billion. Now: do I care if the IPS has traditionally been a tad Kennedy Democrat rather than Tea Party in its outlook? Not really, because – as in the case of Newscorp depravity – facts are facts. And facts raise ethical questions like “Should you really pay your CEO more than you pay for the privilege of living in what is still the best ordered and richest, safest society on the planet?”
I chose to conduct a phone interview him because as much as I thought I knew about American cinema, Adachi has provided a comprehensive piece about the history that few know and talk about, but significant piece of American culture.
Learn, learn, learn… the minute you stop that and think you know it all, your finished.. it is ongoing.. it never ceases to amaze me how many ways that “fabric” can be manipulated! There are so many avenues you can take in the hair business.. how great is that? and you can be creative.. my drug of choice.. lol… anyways.. it is a long twisted path and it just keeps going.. you have to be ambitious, learn your craft well, be creative and really LOVE what you are doing!! Don’t expect things to happen over night.. you will greatly be disappointed. It takes YEARS!!!
The scientists took them through a series of interviews, breath tests and assessments of their levels of drunkenness, such as slurred speech and ability to walk.From the overall sample, 80% said they intended to drink more before returning home, with one in 10 believing their total alcohol intake would be more than 40 units before bedtime.Yea Gods, do SKY not have the common sense to see they have been fed a prepared story by a lobby group Alcohol Concern, a group that is funded by YOU. They are not a charity, at least not in any meaningful way, instead they misuse the charities act; pass themselves off as a charity whilst pushing a political agenda calling for regulations and higher prices on your tipple.
I feel nothing
the lucidity to comprehend,
- protein shake
JWH – 4/24/12
The New Forest is a National Park in the southern part of the UK. A little background information? William The Conqueror, after taking England named this area his 'new hunting ground' in 1079. Nearly 1,000 years later this 'Nova Foresta' still remains unchanged. My prof says it had the most ancient oaks per square mile than any other place in the UK.
Get some water boiling and add broccoli (I used frozen here). Boil until just tender and remove from water, chop to bite-sized pieces, and cook soba noodles in same broccoli-water, 4 minutes. No use wasting energy here, folks.
25 That Small Item You Forgot Was In There (litany based on phrase “my first home,” the beginning of Robert Sullivan’s “Boyle”)
I saw The Avengers twice in 2 days. The first time after an epic all-day Marvel Movie Marathon with my NBFF Geek Outlaw.
Murnau’s reconciliation scene is poetic, if nothing else. The Man hands the Wife flowers (a symbol of rural life, as plants often are in Sunrise), and the Wife clutches them like a bouquet. They attend—crash, really—a wedding, adopt the newlywed’s vows as their own, and are born again as a couple in this urban fantasy land. It is a profoundly abstract solution, and had Gaynor not played her Wife with such naturalism, I might have swallowed it.
Guess I just found part of me. Putting it in writing is making it tangible, visible, functional and permanently etched into my life. I don’t want to change it, any of it. It is a part of me.
Of course, there is also the other military tactic used around the world - that is to jail the political opposition. No one can argue with the current incarceration statistics highlighted for many years by Canada's own Correctional Investigator. Our people are arrested, detained, and jailed far more often, for longer, and with less rehabilitation programs or likelihood of probation than non-Indigenous people. In some prisons out west, the women's detention centres can be 80-100% filled with Indigenous women.
2. I Came Home At Night (Livin' Blues) 7:03
“I do know that. And I did. You should have known that too.”
I jumped up “I really don’t. I’m sorry this happened-“
But there is another clue. Where were the disciples when the Lord departed from them? Look at verse twelve. “ Then returned they unto Jerusalemfrom the Mount called Olivet.” They were on the Mount of Oliveswith the Lord and they were on the Mount of Oliveswhen the Lord departed from them. His departure was from the Mount of Olivesbut what about His Second Coming? Go back to Zechariah 14:4 and it tells us, “His feet shall stand in that day upon the Mount of Olives which is before Jerusalem on the east.” When He returns, His feet will touch the same place as they last stood on the earth, on theMount of Olives. That was the place He gave to His disciples that great Olivet discourse in Matthew 24:3-25:6. Now that is His Second Coming.
He says what’s wrong, isn’t it as you described?
55. Played chicken? - It seems to me I've played this in regular traffic, but only after realizing I'd been roped into it by idiotic drivers with death wishes.
Actually I was thinking to ask Hubby to bring us out for dinner (Gwen and I stayed at home last weekend..boringnya) but I think he will be very tired when he reached home. So I quickly prepared dinner just now.
“The liberty of abode and of changing the same within the limits prescribed by law shall not be impaired except upon lawful order of the court. Neither shall the right to travel be impaired except in the interest of national security, public safety, or public health, as may be provided by law.”
This Christmas Pyramid Gift Box will be in the Revised "1st Edition of 12 Days of Handmade Christmas Gifts" E-book when it is re-released. I temporarily removed it from my Etsy Store because I needed to make some revisions.
I will give you a heads up though; considering I'm still a slave to the institution that is known as culinary school, I'll likely have to save these adventures for the weekends when I'm not drowning in homework.
The consistency of the organic yoghurt and the vaalia is almost identical when scooped from the tub. However the Vaalia has added the maize (corn) thickener, why? Likely that the product was quite thin to start with, as the labelling does say the yoghurt contains water (unlike the Gipssland product). Is this a money saving exercise to spread the product further? Is it cheaper to add maize thickener than just add more yoghurt? Who knows. The maize thickener (1442) is found in many packaged products from muesli & snack bars, to gravy, to packet cake mixes. Its a similar story for the Gelatin.
sounds and which ones go together and which don't, it
Fortunately for me, that's only real life.
The research money must be awarded to those who use a properly defined cohort. Studies that exclude patients with neurological signs, autonomic system dysfunction, post exertional malaise and immune dysregulation (as in the recent PACE Trial) are excluding those who suffer with neurological ME, the exact people they then say they are studying. These erroneous findings are then anticipated to work on the entire community of sufferers. In view of this, is it any wonder, that the interventions recommended by the PACE Trial worked on some patients? CFS is a misdiagnosis and cohorts will have any number of illnesses from burn out, fatigue, depression, adrenal or thyroid disease to lupus or Lyme disease. Studies should, therefore, be carried out on the most severely affected people. These people must have ME and not just chronic fatigue. Some experts have suggested that ME or rather "CFS" (which some doctors wrongly believe to be the same thing, but which is in fact a diagnosis reached after testing is prematurely halted) is being overdiagnosed. This seems likely given the ease with which doctors hand out the diagnosis. The Canadian Criteria should be used for diagnosis and only those who meet it should be studied. This is one reason why research should not be done on patients at the CFS/ME clinics that are set up around the country. Many people who go there are only suffering from fatigue and the most severely affected will not be able to attend the clinics for practical reasons.
7. Through much much of my lifetime, Turkey has had a lousy human rights record, particularly the oppression -- or more accurately, imprisonment and torture -- of its Kurdish minority.
Two weeks ago Brian, Autumn, Elisabeth and Abigail lived next door to us for 5 weeks (1/4 mile away is next door in the country). It was so much fun to just run down to visit. To have Elisabeth spend the day playing and laughing and singing and reading and blowing bubbles... and... and... she is a very active girl and brought so much joy into my life. It was fun having both boys and their families over to eat together, to go to church together and to pray together. We had a very blessed and fun5 weeks of daily interaction - then they had to return to Ft Worth and start packing for Oregon. So happy to have them here but so sad to see them leave ...happy/sad
But, I interrupt, if his logical approach is to be taken at face value, wouldn’t they also have seen the decomposing body of Jesus, and know that far from coming to life again, he was well and truly dead?
"These restaurants can only keep making these offerings and making these choices and making these business sacrifices if people actually buy them. Right?" Mrs. Obama said. "So parents, we literally have to put our money where our mouths are, so that they keep doing it."
Don't have to be strong? Since when did she ever use words like that? The spot on the carpet dissolved into a uniform blur and I buried my head in her shoulder, bewildered but relieved.
Level 18: Damage: +18%, Critical Rate: +18%.
To be clear, no one taught me this. No one sat me down and said, “Boy, doing this stuff is what it means to follow Jesus.” Just the opposite actually. I was told all the time about salvation being an undeserved gift of grace and all about faith. But what I was told and what we practiced was completely different. For example, we said we were saved by faith, but if you missed two Sunday’s in a row people started to wonder if you were still saved.
PepsiCo’s job cuts will affect some 8,700 employees in 30 countries, and are part of a broader productivity program to slice $1.5 billion in annual costs from the global drinks-and-snacks giant by 2014.
The second tea towel has a lovely pale blue and white background with Union Jack bunting at the top and bottom, the number 60 in Union Jack style, and an ornate design in deep pink with a crown on top.
I've been there for 14 years. It's comfortable. Maybe too comfortable.
London Symphony Chorus
with the fiery folly of mauve,
-recovered lampshades with muslin and ribbon
A lot of people on my mothers side, probably suffer from some kind of mood disorder, my Grandmother being one of them. Not much was known about this type of thing in time for it to help her, but Grandma had some money, so she was considered eccentric, rather than crazy.
“They’re not so bad, really…” In the pocket of his baggy coveralls, Charlie had slipped a purloined tiger with horns like a bull. He thought his sister might enjoy it. Or he might put it on the dash of his old Comet, where it would be a sight better than the bobble-head puppy that currently sat there.
Once we'd had our fill of gingerbread and pretzels it was time to head home, pausing to check out the nearly full moon.
Set in a 2024 that’s particularly rundown and possibly not how we would have liked to have pictured it, Crysis 2 depicts New York City, being attacked through a multitude of problems, being a strange virus tearing through entire neighborhoods, the city is under new law through military and private security company Crynet. And to top it all off some aliens invade. Not too hectic then. Cast as Alcatraz, your Marine backgrounding self arrives amidst immense devastation and chaos.
So far this season he is 2-2 with a 2.83 ERA, 1 CG as well as 1 shut-out in 41.1 IP.
Today's post was brought to you by Burma Shave:
Body: FIXIE-BIKE COURIER
3 wonders
"What a dumbass."
Three agents in street clothes snatched her and friend Orlando Luis Pardo off the street in the Havana district of Vedado. "They beat me and then they shoved me into a car head first. They did not give me any explanation at any time, but it is clear their goal was to stop us from taking part in me march," said Sanchez, who writes the blog "Generation Y." Two other friends of hers were ordered into police cars and released later, she added. In an item on her blog, which is often critical of the Americas' only one-party communist system in which only state media are legal, Sanchez wrote an expose under the headline "A Gangland-style Kidnapping";
Having a journalist in the family is great for me, because she keeps me thinking. Of course I think every day, but Tam poses great questions about the things that she is thinking about and it stirs me to think about topics that I wouldn't necessarily be musing over at the time. Last week, she asked me and the other moms in her family and life what it means to us to be a mother of faith. I figure if I'm going to respond, I might as well do it here, so that you can start thinking about what it means to you to be a mother of faith (and share with us)!
AAAAHHH, Nature! And to think that 'proper' plants often struggle or just plain die on you, pfffttt.
and now
Is it just me or is this couch the ugliest piece of furniture you've seen? Anyone have any other contenders of just bad furniture design?
Em’s summer romance with Cade is endearing, causing just a few butterflies to flit back and forth in our stomachs, but like the situation with her family, we ultimately know how everything will work out with them. There’s a brief attempt at a love triangle, but it lacks tension and is easily resolved, leaving us wishing the romantic aspect focused solely on Cade throughout without the unnecessary deviation of a possible relationship with Jeremy. Overall however, The Summer My Life Began is a perfectly enjoyable story, well-suited for a vacation when we just want to sit outside, read, relax and sink into someone else's life without being overwhelmed or stressed by the events taking place in that life.
NØ
Horse confuses dressage arena rail for a cavaletti; exits at K.
Bill “Wood” aka Bill Brockbrader (real name, Brock Williams) was indeed a Navy SEAL but he was not in team 9, he was in Team 11, an off-world unit that very very few know about. (SEAL Teams 7 and 8 are on earth, 9 assigned to inner-earth, 10-12 off-world, 13 inter-dimensional, 14-15 time travel). Right now, however, Bill is working for the CIA, most recently in Operation Peek-a-Boo, along with CIA collegaues Kerry Cassidy and Eva Moore.
ATTENTION: WE INTERRUPT OUR REGULARLY SCHEDULED PROGRAMMING TO ACTUALLY TASTE SOME WHISKY
She sings, she writes, her band rocks….Greta Gaines simply swaggers! Move over Chrissie Hynde."Jessie ScottX Country nelo
Simon Bestwick – The Sons of The City
The wicked and eerie works of Moses Jaen......
Paper: crumb cake, certainly celery, early espresso (SU), cryogen white (PaperTemptress), designer paper (MME)
This set-up seems to naturally lower speeds throughout the city. The faster the mode of transit you’re capable of at street level, the more the onus is on you to travel safely, defensively. Pedestrians amble. Joggers job. Cyclists cycle. Drivers? Well, they go as fast as the situation dictates. They do not dictate the pace.
I suppose then, these meetings are their version of a Hillary-Clinton style "listening tour" to soften the impact, presumably, on the day when the fatal blows finally fall. I can see seeking such input on where to place new facilities, but I don't see why they're needed when contemplating closure, other than as a cathartic exercise for locals who want to speak their piece - a motivation which, while seemingly trivial, shouldn't be completely discounted. People take bad news better if they feel that first you've heard them out. But I suspect that TYC management right now has a pretty good idea of which units it makes sense to keep open and which ones are more trouble than they're worth. And I wonder how much could possibly change between now and June as a result of having received public testimony.
Republic of TeaMel and Patricia Ziegler didn't rest on their laurels after they sold The Banana Republic to The Gap. In fact, they decided to move mountains of tea leaves when they founded The Republic of Tea in 1992. The company's current Minister of Tea, Ron Rubin, continues to run the highly successful business in a socially and environmentally responsible fashion.
I am now on week 3, a week where I am running 2 miles on the allotted days. It’s a bit annoying that I have missed at least one run per week, but they are mainly at the weekends when I’m not near a gym and I’m too scared to let people see me in my lycra!
Rnd 4: ch 3, dc in next dc, 2 dc in next dc, *dc in next 2 dc, 2 dc in next dc; repeat from* around; join with sl st to 1st dc (40 dc)
“So you’re just trying to stand up for yourself?” he said, surprised, as though the idea had just come to him that I might try to do this.
So here is my plan, tonight NO TV, nothing. There is nothing on Wednesday's nights to watch don't even turn it on!! Finish that first tote, take some pics for posting. Get 2nd tote cut, and fused with interfacing and ready to sew. Ladies you inspire me, tonight I make no excuses and take no prisoners - the work will get done. :) As the saying goes in one of my favorite movies, "Chop, chop Owen!"
In one of his lectures (*; *) Naik had an exchange with a Christian concerning the Deity of the Lord Jesus Christ. In this particular clip we get an idea of what transpired between the two of them. From Naik’s reply we see that the Christian tried to use John 14:6 (“I am the Way, and the Truth and the Life, no man comes to the Father except through me”), 9 (“he who has seen me has seen the Father”), and 10:30 (“I and the Father are one”) to prove that Jesus claimed Divinity.
the result of negative reaction
‘I’ll take you home’ he said.
This will have great significance for our violent conflict with Muslims, in that atrocities of this sort tend to be responded to in kind in a tit-for-tat fashion. Loyalist and republican paramilitaries were quite conscious and explicit about the retaliatory nature of their attacks, often killing similar numbers of people to the numbers of their own communities who had been killed in the attacks they were retaliating for. Where will this eventually lead if Muslim terrorists in the UK storm a school and try to recreate the Beslan massacre on British soil?
Thanks to advances in mass communications the 1920s saw the emergence of the modern American athlete as pop icon. Doughy white guys like Babe Ruth began commanding large salaries, and soon professional athletes were regarded as having actual careers and not just as men who “played games for a living.”
I also made sure to NOT follow in my footsteps last race and I made sure I warmed up with a small jog and followed by stretching. All that effort paid off.
By ‘Dayo Farore
Today I woke up and decided to try denim on denim. After years of not liking it much, apparently I've jumped on the bandwagon, and I was totally loving my outfit today. The lady at Chick-Fil-A even told me she liked my style, then I got a free chocolate shake sample, so today was totally a win.
● Marx, Letter to Arnold Ruge
First, there is the blog, Glamarella Junk and the sister blog, La Maison Rustique. The Barn, in Temecula was one of the places I had hoped to visit on our last trip to California. Sadly, we really hadn't enough time on that trip. I'm saying "next time"!
today’s assassination of Comrade
It was great to find a description of what the beer tasted like nine years ago, because it was very clearly in possession of many of these same characteristics: "A fresh hop aroma with notes of honey and toffee, leads to a slightly sweeter taste and burnt, bitter aftertaste." It was a tad oxidized, but minimally so. The stronger flavor was the burned toffee--burned in the sense that toffee involves browned sugar. As we were discussing it, another friend even pulled out the honey note, which was still intact. Luscious and creamy, it managed a nice, sustained head.
And the Burpos said that Colton painstakingly described images that he said he saw in heaven — like the bloody wounds on Jesus’ palms — that he had not been shown before.
The Australians Greens have backed a call for a moratorium on fossil fuel projects in Victoria.
Largely overlooked by Westerners is the fact that the government of Iraq is moving forward with plans to protect the archaeological remains of the ancient City of Babylon, in preparation for building a modern city of Babylon. As I wrote in 2009, the project — originally started by the late Saddam Hussein — is aimed eventually at attracting scores of “cultural tourists” from all over the world to see the glories of Mesopotamia’s most famous city. What’s more, the Obama Administration has actually helped contribute U.S. taxpayer dollars to “The Future of Babylon Project” through the State Department’s budget. Read more at the World Monuments Fund website for the rebuilding Babylong project.
But still...it's so much fun, and totally worth it!
Lamb Chop Salad
Yep. It's Tuesday. That only means one thing.....Glee!!! Actually it's weigh in day but let's talk Glee for just a sec. OK? Great.
- Tossing the red beans in a bit of flour prevents them all sinking to the bottom of the pan.
Today, I am sharing these ornaments that I created . They are easy to make and adding the touches of embossing gives them some dimension and lift.
49 home
Frank Crummey
RANTING!!
Meanwhile, I spent a pleasant weekend experimenting in the kitchen. First, I decided to try another America's Test Kitchen recipe, this one for Chicago Style Deep-Dish Pizza. Now, I'm normally a thin-crust girl. I can practically whip up a grilled pie or flat bread in my sleep. But deep-dish is another animal. I'm hesitant to even call is "pizza," it's something else entirely. But ATK provided a thorough recipe, complete with pictures and video (another reason I love their site), and it looked too delicious not to try. I got started on the dough and actually remembered the take pictures this time!
Coercive sexual fantasy is commonly reported by rapists while participating in treatment (McKibben, Proulx, & Lusignan, 1994), and under optimal conditions in laboratory tests, about 60% of rapists demonstrate preferential arousal to saliently-coercive rape stimuli as compared to 10% of unconvicted individuals (Lalumière, Quinsey, Harris, Rice, & Trautrimas, 2003). Among convicted rapists it is those who have more persistently engaged in rape and assault who are more likely to show preferential arousal to saliently-coercive rape in laboratory tests (Willmot & Hart, 1996). Among individuals with no official record of sexual offending, preferential arousal to saliently-coercive rape as indicated by laboratory tests is found to be substantially correlated with self-report of engaging in sexually coercive behavior in the great majority of studies (Bernat, Calhoun, & Adams, 1999; Lalumière & Quinsey, 1996; Lohr, Adams, & Davis, 1997; Malamuth, 1986).
Please email me at thesquirrelandthefox@hotmail.com for details on how to claim your prize. Remember also to take your Winner's badge from the side bar. I hope you'll display it proudly on your blog.
Congrats! Don't forget to grab your badges too!
A pair of pot-smoking roommates, Harold and Kumar (Cho and Penn), get a severe case of the munchies and an overwhelming craving for hamburgers after seeing a TV commercial for fastfood chain White Castle. They set out to visit an all-night White Castle, but their simple trip turns into a major quest as they drive, run, ride, and hangglide through the strangest night of their lives.
03 Seasick
so what do i plan for 2012? - I hope to be more loving, kind, tolerant and understanding towards others, but more importantly towards my SELF. I hope to find time to nurture myself, to find time to meditate and walk more. to sit barefoot upon the earth.. but best of all - I plan to walk the land of my ancestors in Cornwall - later in 2012.
Tonight he came to me and asked me to pat his back, as I was sitting on the couch feeding his baby sister. I told him he could put his head on my lap and I’d pat his back. As he got comfy and I started to pat away he asked if his Daddy could hold the baby because I hold her a lot sometimes.
I made this Berenstein Bear pillow case for my little guy. He picked out all the fabric and made sure I brought it along. We took the front rails off his crib the day after I got back and he wanted a new big pillow and case for his big guy bed. Now the challenge is keeping him in bed every night. Him and big brother now think that bedtime is party time!
The beauty industry is over saturated with products, with so many choices, how do you know what’s the best bang for your buck? Mascara is used, replaced, and bought more frequently than other items. Beautiful, luscious lashes impact our facial expression by enhancing eye color and brow shape, so … how do you pick the right one? What are the pros of a good mascara?
I've only wore these once and it was for this review. My eyes have been feeling uncomfortable lately so I haven't wore lenses for weeks now.
On November 10th, 2010 Microsoft hit Motorola for a second time. This time asserting that Motorola was breaching codes of conduct and not offering its licenses for a fair royalty. This second blow was a preemptive strike as Microsoft must have known Motorola was preparing a counter attack of their own. Less then 24 hours later Motorola responded with a lawsuit against Microsoft for breaching 16 patents. On November 22nd , 2010 Motorola did what every gamer feared Motorola went after the Xbox. Motorola alleged that Microsoft’s Xbox as well as Windows used patented wifi technology as well as H.264 video encoding.
She was sleeping in her swing one night and I came in the room to get her and one of the boys put this on her head...I just thought it was sweet.
I certainly did not mean to insinuate that my child is not being exposed to literature in his current schooling. He absolutely is, and to a lot of it. His teacher has read them fabulous books, many of long-standing renown. She often (and wisely) reads the first in a series, without continuing on, which piques their interest and then allows the children to pursue the rest of the books on their own. That’s how Braedan was turned on to the Little House books, which I had never ever read until this year, and now with the Narnia books, which again I’d only ever read The Lion, The Witch and The Wardrobe. Now, Braedan is reading them all on his own, plus I’m following along by reading them aloud at night.
Heat the olive oil in a frying pan or wok
I’m not writing this post because I want sympathy. Or your well wishes. I’m writing to get this off my chest because frankly, I’m getting antsy.
4And the four and twenty elders and the four beasts fell down and worshipped God that sat on the throne, saying, Amen; Alleluia.
Forgiveness
Because these two weren't a match, I visited the minty green wing of my nail polish museum to see if I could find something closer. I selected Essie Turquoise & Caicos and Models Own Jade Stone to come to the swatching room.
“Rela please!” I lurched forward grabbing her. She screamed and jerked back throwing me off balance.
Shhhh... I have a secret boyfriend. Don't tell The Man. Though if he reads this post then the cat is out of the bag and I really should have never put a cat in a bag in the first place.
Why the hell did I wait this long to join a CSA again?
And the sorrow that one has
14. Mouth's Cradle - Björk, Choir & Mark Bell (AGAIN!)
In order to solve the murder of his former teammate, Danny must first solve the mystery of the little girl. A mystery that will take him into the underworld of human trafficking and child exploitation.
Rhiannon Jenkins plans events and is getting better as she is in the job but now there is a problem. A man who is ten years younger is needing her help for a party but he is stiring something inside of her.
the usual kind
* If you actually believed that last part, you don’t know what his idea of a “heartwarming” story is.
This is a process. The length of that process depends on how freely you open up to improving your mindset and releasing that old way of thinking or behaving.
When Conan's show finally premiered on TBS, the audience he had gained through his career at Late Night with Conan O'Brien and the Tonight show, the audience he had gained through Dancing Tacos, I Miss Conan videos, and exclusive Foursquare badges tuned in and put him on the ratings throne of late night television.
So that was our short but very sweet little break away.
I spoke to my dad the other night. As I looked at his photograph on top of my mum's television cabinet, it was as though he was really there, really looking at me and really smiling. It was an incredible emotionally charged moment for me as his face came to life through the glass frame. My dad; my hero. Whenever I go to stay at my mum's house near Bolton, I always tell myself I'm going to make time to go to his grave. I want to kneel at the stone that clearly states his name and imagine the shell that is his body lying just a few feet away from me. But I haven't been for many years now, because I feel closer to him when I'm here, at home.
I look to see the rain falling on their shell shocked heads and realize that summers going and the weathers getting crap,
I hope all of the Mama Ladies in my life had a beautiful, wonderful Mother's Day. I missed you Su, Mom, Grandma, and Anna. You all deserve the most wonderful blessings and I am thankful for the mothers in my life, my family and my friends. The women who have influenced my own adventures into motherhood are such a diverse, creative collective. I have learned who I want to be, what I agree with (and what I don't), how to love, and how to raise my children to the best of my ability. Thank you for your love and support.
Why did I pick it up and start reading this book? I had heard it suggested to my sister-in-law on her Facebook page, but if I’m going to be honest, then I need to admit that it was because I had heard that Edward Cullen was going to play the lead in the movie. So there’s that. Please judge away. To say that I loved the book would be a gross understatement. Did I picture him in it the whole time? Absolutely. I had trouble imagining Reece Witherspoon playing opposite, but whatever. The book was amazing.
The Gospel of Thomas, for example, reflects an intense disdain for ordinary Christians, and claims to deliver a unique and secret body of teaching of which only certain believers are worthy. It’s elitist to the core, so it’s unlikely that those responsible for it ever wanted to have it treated as one text/voice among others.
Stay connected with the latest news and information on Treasure Buddies.
Have a wonderful Monday!!
This recipe is super simple and isn't composed of anything fancy except for maybe the coconut milk. In a well stocked kitchen, most ingredients I'm sure you'll have handy and if you don't have the coconut milk, you can use regular milk.... you'll just end up with Vanilla Cupcakes.
I thought so. ;-)
For anyone who enjoys a beer and a good yarn and has some sense of the ties that really bind a Nation’s culture, this site is worth a look. And if you can, get out on ANZAC Day and raise a glass to those who fought so that you could have a nice cold beer and not have to ask for it in Japanese or German. Even if it is only a VB.
Of a certainty, I know tomorrow will be fine because I have sought the face of My God and King.
It doesn't make sense that giving up our right to ourselves will set us free, but it does. It doesn't make sense that giving up our striving will give us peace, but it does. And it doesn't make sense that giving up our heart will give us life, but it is the greatest change you will ever experience.
The president is still in talks with House Speaker John Boehner (R., Ohio) over how to lift the debt cap in time to avoid a government default, Mr. Geithner said.
Now on to what these truly amazing
At times in winter the road at Shotford Bridge towards Weybread flooded and we had great fun riding our cycles through the flood water, going home wet through. One winter, I think it must have been that of 1939/40 there was a lot of snow and Alan’s father made him a sledge, much to my envy as my father wasn’t much good at making things. Then his father made him a better one with strips of tin nailed on the runners to make it faster. Alan kindly gave me his old one and we would sledge on a meadow towards Starston past the Drill Hall. This meadow had a steep hill and there was a beck at the bottom. We would compete on our sledges traveling at speed to reach the beck. We would go home in the dark with our clothes soaked or even frozen and our hands red raw with cold but we considered it all worth while.
CRANBERRY PECAN CHICKEN SALAD
Me: do you feel unwell?
GET IN THE RUNNING TO WIN!
My gorgeous baby sister, Hannah, recently celebrated her 40th birthday. A child possessed of a huge imagination, her dolls were elaborate props as she acted out characters from books. When she was eight, Hannah became Cinderella for an entire summer! She insisted on wearing rags and set herself all kinds of weird and wonderful chores to do. I was visiting home one day (I was married by this time), and was astonished to find her on her knees scrubbing the kitchen floor with a small brush! She was a very determined little girl and once she had set a goal, she accomplished it. Hannah now owns her own very unique dance studio in Ottawa, and is also the author of a wonderful series of books which are used in many schools as a resource guide for part of the physical education program. Hannah parents her three year old son with loving imagination and intelligence. She is the most consistent parent I know.
Perhaps they do, but if their life was fire,
You can see that they are the same height but the Lime Crime lipstick is bigger in circumference and just allover chunkier. Personally i just think it's a bit odd, and probably why people think it looks like childs makeup. It's not a big deal, i can't imagine it's going to bother too many people but i just think it looks a bit clumsy and chunky.
PH 08 9206 3667 Credit card Accepted over the phone.
A complete history of the Irish stout industry would be an interesting and instructive thing. It has never been written. Nor even, in the whole mass of brewing literature, have we come across a treatise dealing deeply and exhaustively with the principles of blending malt liquors, and the mysterious changes and flavours Induced by vatting in immense bulk. It is passing strange that so little has been done on this side of the Channel to account for the Complexities of Irish brewing. Considering that the most gigantic brewing concern in the world has arisen from these complexities, entirely on a free-trade basis, and that it still grows faster, perhaps, than any other existing firm it would seem worth while in this scientific age to attempt to get to the scientific bottom of it.
“But you disappeared on me for nine months,” I sob back. “What was I supposed to think? I had to get on with my life.”
Many thanks also to all who follow, subscribe, like and comment on my pages. Much love, everyone.
Gabi Zedlmayer, VP, Sustainability and Social Innovation, HP
Chin Woo Stadium, whether you realised it or not, is a GREAT PLACE for concerts – the closed oval shaped dome of the venue creates an interesting sound experiences, depending on where you are in the stadium! BTW – The pic below is when the doors just opened. the place was filled when the show finally started!
For a little light relief, our tiny hero visits Falstaff and they certainly got on like 'a house on fire' both sharing stories of lifes adventures. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Falstaff
Eventually, Stingo (the narrator) pulls her away from abusive Nathan, and offers her redemption, but Sophie, after revealing her horrible secret, chooses death. All the torments she has endured, including her part in the death of her children, have not made her stronger or better suited for life. Strange but her suicide is a relief, I am happy her pain is finally over. Is that what we get from torturing characters to the point of no return? We want to mercy kill them!
Good day overall.
She screams
This clearly does not refer to procreation in terms of Jesus being conceived by the Holy Spirit; so we should expect to see some other nuances involved in the New Testament concept of divine sonship.
Deadline: Entries close on May 12, 2012
The darkness
After all those year, and after they promised me by a previous problem, that they will send the papers and instructions for return in the packet, still no return papers are available in the post-packet. No instructions for the customer how to return the products when he is dissatisfied with them. In case you have a printer you can download them from the website, if you were able to find the appropriate, difficult to find, document. (In the mean time the clock is running and you are loosing lots of time to be in time to return the goods.)
*If you have suggestions or questions regarding topics , let me know.
Many historians contend that Pius XII did not do enough to save Jews during the Holocaust. The Vatican has long said that Pius, who was pope from 1939 to 1958, helped save many Jews who were hidden in Roman Catholic churches, monasteries and convents.
So brownie and white chocolate are the secret ingredients...or not so secret!
As Rose and I are without camera for our trip we have invented a new family game. As we all read the same paper, The Guardian, we all enter mini articles into the weekly Readers Tips section of the Travel. The scores for being published so far are:
4 — Demographics Favour Islam
Honestly tell when you look at me
April 14 - Jon Cedar, actor (Corporal Langenscheidt on "Hogan's Heroes"), 80
As for the rest of my outfit.. I am wearing a lovely fluffy knit that I stumbled across in the divided department of h&m. Such a nice surprise, how great is the combination of fluff and dip dye? I'm having a hard time convincing people that it was a 20 something pound find.
Other sightings today were Cormorant, Shelduck, Little Egret (nice) Redshank, Lapwing, Great Crested Grebe and a very excited birder had spotted a Hooded Merganser. I didn't get a good look and to be honest it was a blob amongst the gulls when I looked through my bins, so obviously he had a very powerful scope and set up. Below are some of the best shots of the day even if they are a bit distant. Cracking day and some fab birds.
Finally, finally, finally. The Philippines’ back at the FIBA Asia semis. With notable wins over the national teams of Jordan and Chinese Taipei, Smart Gilas Pilipinas was poised to reclaim basketball glory once again. Led by naturalized center Marcus Douhtit, Team Pilipinas was looking to surge into the Olympics. Being a former international basketball powerhouse, it is quite understandable that the fans expected and anticipated a finals showdown with the Chinese national team and a W over China would give a sure spot for the 2012 London Olympics. When the Gilas boys beat Chinese Taipei to earn the slot in the final four, a lot of fans were already talking about the prospect of bringing home the gold, especially when Jordan beat two-time defending champion Iran. The fans smelled the crown while I drooled over the idea. Sadly, Team Gilas bowed to Jordan during the semis (75-61) and this spoiled the dreams of an entire nation. However, the Philippines still had a shot for redemption, a third-place finish could also provide a slim chance of getting into the 2012 Olympics. And then there was South Korea. We lost for the third time in the tourney, 70-68. The Olympic dream for the Philippines is dead. Well, AT LEAST FOR NOW. Team Philippines shall rise and eventually bring the coveted crown back to our shores.
The fact that ITV is allocated thousands of free tickets anyway? Why on earth does Robbie Earle need forty tickets for a Holland Denmark game in the first place?
My blog candy giveaway is open for US & International, good luck!
Nookie travelled well and arrived in Wales safe and sound, he has been turned out with two others and after a little pecking order discussion he has settled down well, he has towed SIL twice down to the field much to my surprise!! tee hee, she is not fazed by it and will sort him out I think its just excitement! he will be shod and started in work as soon as abscess foot allows.
From the Flying Dog press release:
On Sundays, after church, we come home and cook Belgian waffles, or monkey bread. We cut up fresh fruit, fry up some bacon, and pour glasses of icy cold orange juice. My kids all help with the preparation. I love teaching my kids to cook. My daughter, Savannah is taking a foods class in high school this year. She's come home from school and told me, in disbelief, "Mom, the other kids didn't even know how to peel a potato!" Or, "No one else knew how to dice an onion!" I'm glad, by the time my kids leave the house, they'll possess basic cooking skills and won't have to eat popcorn for dinner every night. Now if I could just get them to help me clean up the kitchen...
Median income in South Los Angeles is lower now than during the 1992 riots, and the unemployment rate has reached even more dire levels.
It’d be easy to think that if we just provide clean water or just provide basic educational needs then we’ve finished our job. It becomes extremely easy if you only focus on one aspect of the problem. What makes ONE so important is that they are there to remind us of the sheer enormity of the problem and the great, multi-faceted needs of those in extreme poverty.
“Of course! says the great Khan. Give him the finest horse we have! Let him escape!
So I was supposed to be in court at 9 AM, and it was already 8:15 on account of me being late. And not only did I have to make it to court, but I also had to go meet the police officer who decided to wait until the same goddamn day as court to tell me I had to be there and then act like I was doing something wrong by not being home between the hours of 8 and 5 Monday through Friday.
Malina did say she wanted color in her hair...
Mind you, I am not a vampire; nor is this the fault of any obsessive-compulsive mirror-avoidance on my part—I do have a full-length mirror in my house (it’s on my closet door. There’s also a half-length three-way mirror in the bathroom that makes for very entertaining conversations). The problem is that I live alone.
Yarn needle
Personal Mission: Find the French Spy Durant (before he escapes with the battle plans)
Got other ideas? Let us know! Otherwise, stay tuned, and keep updating!
Then we go drive our alternative yet still equally gas and oil dependant hybrid cars, of which everyone else is also marketed to about their unique and conservation oriented styles, even though the creation and disposal of their batteries is secretly worse on the environment than ten years of the exhaust created from driving an SUV. And the battery must be replaced after five or six years! And so we drive… feeling better somehow about our insignificant pollution as we sip on one of 30 unique plastic bottled water brands marketed as environmentally friendly and recyclable, which it so happens are all owned by 4 major conglomerate corporations which are owned through collective investments by our government.
Swyler’s elegant groupings of vessels continue to employ similar conceptual and formal elements to that of the traditional still life. By focusing on the nuanced relationship between two or three forms she encourages close inspection and even touch. Her employment of negative space, small concentrations of color and subtle lines drawn between pots encourage the viewer to look more closely as the pieces reveal themselves slowly over time. Inspired by ceramic history, family and ornithology, Swyler’s poignant vessels encourage the exploration of our intimate lives.
We are free to settle for prison life, but as Christ-followers we have the chance for so much more. Christ offers us a new way to live, but we must change the way we view the world.
I've heard people question why they should care about the extinction of a specific species, whether it's animal or plant or tree, and the answer is so amazingly obvious. Even if you believe that humans have some innate something that makes them "better" than other animals (for we are simply another species of animal), our survival is linked with the survival of every other species on the planet. When a forest is cut down, every human and non-human is ensured less oxygen. When the great fish of the ocean are driven extinct, we ensure ourselves, as well as countless other animals, and countless other forests, less food. When we pollute a river, or all rivers (there are toxins in every single river now), we ensure that both humans and non-humans will no longer be able to drink clean water. Everything we do to harm another life, whether it's trees, animals, rivers, it harms us. Karma in it's truest form.
And yesterday, I went to another neighbor's birthday party for their 4 year old. And of course I brought my 6 month old to show off. I'm trying to play nice in the new neighborhood, you understand. I'm also trying to meet moms with kids close to my daughter's age so they can end-up playing together someday.
@Gary
And since I got back from St Malo I've been catching up on my sleep and getting in the right headspace again for Charles Dexter Ward and I'm back in Lovecraft country where I can post sneak peeks (this picture here isn't one of them - don't worry, a Gug doesn't show up in a suit in the middle of the story).
“There is zero tolerance for discrimination at USDA, and I strongly condemn any act of discrimination against any person,” Agriculture Secretary Tom Vilsack said in a statement carried by several news outlets. “We have been working hard through the past 18 months to reverse the checkered civil rights history at the department and take the issue of fairness and equality very seriously.”
For those not in the know, Simon is the owner of the Royal Tunbridge Wells Brewing Company, and the man responsible for bringing back brewing to the town after a lapse of 25 years. As someone with over 20 years involvement in the brewing industry Simon also managed to negotiate a new lease on the Bedford, with owners Greene King, that allows him to sell beers from his own brewery, plus a range of different guest ales, alongside GK's usual offerings of IPA and Abbot. When I called in, the pub had Dipper, Royal Best Bitter and the seasonal Helles from RTWB, together with Gadd's No.7, Tring Colley's Dog and Milestone Lion's Pride on sale, along with the aforementioned GK beers. Bushels Cider, from Biddenden was also available on hand pump.
My question is: If he’s not God, how then is he perfect? But the JWs say that he was sinless and perfect. I just can’t wrap my mind around there being more than one perfect, sinless, holy being in this universe. It’s just a weird concept for me to grasp. And I have enormous difficulty trying to comprehend how someone who is NOT God could effectively take my place on the cross.
I cannot understand why people get all upset about this. Who cares? The real question is, why do we allow the government to be a 3rd party to marriage in the first place. Isn't marriage a contract between 2 people? Why is the state allowed to be a 3rd party? Christians, above all, should hold that marriage should be only between the 2 people and God.
The oddities creep in slowly though, allowing time for the equally impressive moments of pure restraint to take hold. This is evident right from the album's opening track, a cover of a tune called "Sugar Baby" popularized by banjo troubadour Dock Boggs in the 1920's, one of the record's highest peaks and a fitting introduction to the melancholy, introspective atmosphere Amidon likes to conjure. Boggs' gorgeously expressive version was a frantic assualt of messy banjo plucking and nearly unintelligible lyrics pleading desperately through thick static for his "sugar baby" to return to him. Amidon reverses the formula altogether. His is a slow, meditative rendition, one that so thoroughly stretches out the repetitive refrains ("I got no sugar baby now", " Who'll rock the cradle when you're gone?") that they acquire an aching emotional urgency more serious and convincing than that of Boggs. All of a sudden the story of a man pining for his true love to come back home to him and their child possesses a contemporary relevance, a plea for the many marriages on the rocks in today's scatterbrained society. Here Amidon's simple acoustic picking is supplemented by the muted electric guitar melodies of Pakistani musician Shahzad Ismaily and a single bass clarinet. At just over five minutes, the song's desolate sound-scape is hypnotizing in its repetitiousness and emotional sincerity.
Some reviews of Taylor Brady’s Microclimates (Krupskaya, 2001) align the writing with Proust’s detailed attention to the minutiae of memory. This is true if one imagines Proust’s brain on quantum mechanics—a scenario in which atoms of lived experience, closely observed, are only partially inhabited as the gaze which calls them back into being simultaneously splices them into the waves and particles of variant sequences, times, and layers of subjectivity. In his newest book, Occupational Treatment, Brady continues this kind of narrative remembrance of things past, potential, present and perishing from the Florida of his childhood.
Bake 20 to 25 minutes or until a toothpick comes out clean.
What pillow has your vote? I want to purchase at least one of the pillows from Pillowtalkk for my project. If the one you love the most isn’t on this post, that is ok too! Let me know what your favorite one is!
Preheat oven to 400. Line baking sheet with parchment or grease it liberally. Place defrosted puff pastry sheet on top and spread fig jam over entire surface. Spread caramelized onions and arrange Brie cheese slices over the top. Bake for 25 minutes, until pastry is puffed and golden.
Lors l’infidelle Dieu & sainctz voguera.
After watching this video I will certainly be researching more into this technique. I just think it would be wonderful for your baby to be able to tell you exactly what they want right from birth. I think it would help parents get through the baby stage with less stress.
un/homeschooled kids who used to come when THEY were 6 and under still come and
Freewheel remover
- 3 tbsp kinnogomadar (Japanese sesame sauce with roasted nuts)
Place pepperoni slices and shredded cheese on each wedge, and then roll up (starting from the big bottom and ending at the small point).
What our children are being taught in school about our history and our society are lies, pure and simple, and that has been the case now for decades.
When you pick the cilantro leaves, remove the stringier parts of the stalks but keep the finer ones, as they are nice to eat. Place in a bowl with the arugula, mint, watermelon, and radishes. Put the ginger, chili, soy sauce, olive oil, and sesame oil into a smaller bowl and add just enough lime juice to cut through the oil—the number of limes you use will depend on how juicy they are. Season to taste.
One ludicrous thing recalls another. And mine just happened to be that I had told a friend at his son's party earlier that day that his son's artwork should be in the bathroom.
Why? Golden Dawn is a Nazi party - not merely an ultra-right party, but an honest-to-Cthulhu Nazi Party (they even use the Hitlergruss as a salute, if you can believe it). Their book store sells Greek-language copies of Mein Kampf, they despise foreigners and those Eurozone countries that forced the austerity measures on them. Like Germany, for example (and extra Irony points).
Police say they have increased patrols around headquarters of nine conservative media outlets in Seoul after North Korea vowed to soon carry out a “special military action” on them by “unprecedented means and methods.”
The Fool carries a bag that contains himself – all that he is. He is a living Tree of Life, the beginning and the end. The image is a universal key, with all of the elements of creation. The dragons are the twin serpents held by the Sumerian God Enki. The butterflies are symbols of transformation.
As one people, united, we acknowledge the reality: that the future of the human race requires the cooperation of its members; that our system must protect our rights, and upon corruption of that system, it is up to the individuals to protect their own rights, and those of their neighbors; that a democratic government derives its just power from the people, but corporations do not seek consent to extract wealth from the people and the Earth; and that no true democracy is attainable when the process is determined by economic power. We come to you at a time when corporations, which place profit over people, self-interest over justice, and oppression over equality, run our governments.
I really need his help right now.
Fact #14: Sara Lomas makes Photoshop look better.
The last things that need doing are decorating, preparing the Maypole, and cooking for the potluck dinner. I love to dance the Maypole. We always end up laughing and having a good time. This year, I have friends bringing their drums and others who will be belly dancing for us. Today promises to be a wonderful day. Time to get busy,…after I finish my coffee. For now, I think I’ll enjoy the quiet.
What he did was stupid, but 'stupid' doesn't sum up his entire person. Plus, he’s the one with the broken Sedan, not us.
How was no spending week? Do you have any resources for times of structured prayer? I would love to hear them!
Send your feedback to realestate.review@dawn.com
You know it is funny, this Mission involves breakthroughs in technology, and in the case of the iPad we sent to Jake, one of the delays in writing about the experience of his receipt of the iPad was a breakdown of a technology of a different kind, and that was the Walker family camera.
1. Drown
The rally, with City Council Member Letitia James speaking at right, aimed to get Gov. David Paterson “to suspend demolitions, displacement of residents and businesses, infrastructure disruptions and further subsidies to the project so that changes to the project can be assessed and a new plan prepared with community involvement.”
Okay, write-ups like that are supposed to make a book seem appealing, but sometimes the actual story and writing leaves much to be desired. This is not the case. Harkness's style is enjoyable and the text is laden with historical and scientific factors (Harkness is a professor of history herself), which serve to root this tale in reality (as well as appealing to the history-geek portion of myself). Yes, this story makes the existence of witches, daemons, and vampires plausible. You may find yourself wondering what if?
bigger.
Mischa and my back complied and I quickly fell asleep.
I am NOT saying ALL of my adopted children don't trust me, or are not bonded, some of them are, deeply. NOR am I saying all adopted children are hot messes...some of my kiddo's really and truley are doing incredibly well, as I expect are some of yours. That doesn't go to say that some day, some time in their lives they are not going to experience the loss that them being separated from that first mother for whatever reason has afforded them. I as an adoptive Mama, have to own that and be prepared for that for them.
Such corn contrasts tartly with Henley's prickly speeches against humanity. A true oracle of the obvious, Henley piles up the usual suspects (America's arrogance, consumerism and ignorance of the consequences of war) like he's telling us something we don't know.
This stairway might give you a sense of the steepness of the hillside on which the village was built. At this point the rain had stopped, but there was still a chill in the air. We decided to warm up with some coffee, so we looked for an open cafe in the near-empty village.
he wants to park too but
First of all, he is HILARIOUS, especially if you like sarcastic!
CAPD is to the ears what dyslexia is to the eyes. Children with dyslexia see numbers and letters upside down, jumbled, or moving around. Children with CAPD hear sounds, words and sentences jumbled up, out of order, and with some distortion.
Identification with the Torah
*Product Quality
I return to childlike innocence,
That six-year-old was later dubbed A-Read and is now about to turn 9. He has moved from Dr. Seuss to Shel Silverstein, from Eric Carle to Brandon Mull.
When I mention word verification, everyone knows what I'm talking about. Sometimes it's called "Captcha". Blogger calls it "automatic spam detection for comments" requiring "people leaving comments on your blog to complete a word verification step".
Hazen of course is still growing like crazy. I feel like he changes every day! He will be 3 months pretty soon here. He smiles a ton and is starting to giggle a bit. He occasionally finds his thumb and we think it is so stinkin cute!
For a chance to win a $100 Visa gift card, leave me a comment here and let me know what the best part of your summer was.
Don’t worry about anything; instead, pray about everything. Tell God what you need, and thank him for all he has done. Philippians 4:6 (NLT)
Matthew Barnes is a young exec on the move up who finds himself a pawn in corporate in-fighting when he's sent to London to oversee a merger. He's to replace John Gissing; Gissing's gotten wind of it, and he makes sure that Matthew and his wife Linda, who has dutifully but reluctantly come to England, have a miserable first few days there. By the time Matthew figures out what's happening and declares a counter-offensive, it may be too late to save himself from a transfer to Detroit. With Gissing still holding lots of card and Linda growing more unhappy by the moment, Matthew must re-evaluate. All-out war? A pertnership with Gissing? Or some third way?
Obviously I am not working alone, there is a team of five people on each shift, and it is these ‘challenging’ shifts that show us how fantastically we all work as a team, and the amazing knowledge that other members of the team have. It is a great time to learn, not only how to deal with difficult situations but also to learn about yourself and examine what you could do differently in future to allow peace and calmness to prevail.
10 pm: Spring Break Fashion Show presented by Diane
www.givenliqueur.com
I 'll never tell this to anybody. But I live worried because I feel very excited when I see one of your comments in my blog and I know I don't have the attention to thank your visit to my blog....
cause family is a fine art indeed, isn't it?
John Hodgman, or, as I like to call him, ‘John the Hodgman’, is one silly guy, I tell ya. He’s been doing spots (does not mean painting dots on cubicles, etc.) on ‘The Daily Show, with Jon Stewart’ for a few years now, and that’s where/when I started to get his shtick/humor. Before then, used to annoy me when/wherever I’d see him. But, with time, his stuff started to become freaking hilarious to me. I mean from one tail of the bell-curve (shout out/holla gini-coefficients, and standard deviations in the hizz-ouse!) to the other. From thouroughly annoying to thouroughly enjoying. Kind of a rare thing (more later on why. He’s penned (or penciled thanks to a one, David Rees) a trilogy of books that encompass, well, a whole hell of a lot of things. Take the title of the first one of the three, ‘The Areas of my Expertise:
There was also a slight stomach problem and by slight, I mean at mile 21 it must have looked like someone turned a faucet at the back of my head to full blast and it wouldn't stop. I'm pretty sure it was the Gatorade (it just hasn't been the same since they dropped the Tiger formula), the extra time on the boat, the steak dinner the night before, the ginger pills I took to avoid getting seasick, the cookie I ate at mile 14, and the lack of sleep (I forgot to mention that we stayed at the 2nd oldest hotel in California and it was described as cute and quaint which are code words for small and old and the walls were paper-thin, I think they actually used paper instead of drywall back when they built this thing, but they did have coffee and bananas laid out for the runners at 4 AM which made up for a lot). I tried to keep everything down and I kept telling myself to hold it in, but positive self-talk only goes so far, sometimes you've just got to puke. A lot of people passed me as I was doing my best to fertilize the side of the trail, and most ignored me which was nice, some gave me some words of encouragement, which was also nice, but one guy said something rude like come on, or nice, but it wasn't what he said, it was the way he said it that really pissed me off, which was a good thing because I made it my goal to catch the guy and pass him, which I am happy to say that I did.
The main idea behind the book is that for centuries human beings, technology, society and culture have evolved very slowly. The pace of change was so slow that within few generations that change was not visible. But last century changed all that. People were able to perceive the changes within same generation. In the last few decades the changes became so fast for a particular generation that future was coming as shock to people. I have myself now seen these changes happening within last few years and I could clearly see why these changes are to be called as shock.
"Ms. Cassandra and Miss Rowan (Take a walk in the Dark Woods)"
800-SUICIDE (784-2433)
“Couldn’t you ask for assistance on your next trip and specifically request me?”
More recently, Emilio from Argentina has come to work with a church in Melksham for a year. He helps run groups for local children and elderly people, who hugely appreciate him, and has encouraged the church to begin reaching out to teenagers at the local skate park.
I see the best of me inside your eyes
The guide is free and has chapter titles such as “Psychological Warfare,” “Dealing with Superior Players,” “Identifying and Exploiting Premades.” If that doesn’t whet your whistle, I don’t know what will.
I plan to use this one in the kitchen, but I shot it in my studio for better lighting at that time of day.
ANYway, this morning after she woke up, Sweet Pea bounded into our room and happily proclaimed, "that was fun! I like sleeping by myself in my own high bed (the guest bed is on a frame; the kid bed in our room is not) in a different room!"
I bought shoes for you today. Since we've been home I've not bought you a single thing because it felt too hopeful. It felt like tempting fate. But I saw two pairs of sneakers on clearance at Target and thought "Well, he's going to need shoes..." and in to the cart they went. Chances are they won't be the perfect size but I bought them anyway.
Um…
Nina Lee Aquino is a director, dramaturge and playwright. She is the artistic director of Cahoots Theatre Company and an artistic associate of Factory Theatre. She is also the editor of Canada’s first Asian-Canadian drama anthology titled love & relasianships (Playwrights Canada Press, Spring 2009). Other credits include awards for directing (Ken McDougall Award 2004, Canada Council John Hirsch Prize 2008), and Dora Mavor Moore Award nominations for outstanding direction (Singkil, fu-GEN Theatre Company 2007; People Power, Carlos Bulosan Theatre 2008, lady in the red dress, fu-GEN Theatre Company 2009). Nina co-wrote Miss Orient(ed) and her monologues have been published in Beyond the Pale (Yvette Nolan, ed.) and She Speaks (Judith Thompson, ed.)
What I have learned however, as I become a professional 'soldes' shopper in Paris, is that perhaps it's better to brave the masses of fashion obsessed Parisians in the first few days, in order to find that special something before it's all gone, which can happen quickly! Usually when I wait until the end I tend to find that 'something I didn't know I was looking for but couldn't resist' rather than what I in fact needed.
for myself too if i had
Our brothers and sisters, from any religion, color, nationality and good will belief should be a sufficiently strong force to overflow us with universal love. Universal love we would extend to other animal species, which should also grab from us the responsibility and respect for their lives.
The whole day seemed like it was going to be just one of those lousy wagering days as the WiseGuy continued to miss one then hit one then miss one and so on. I had decided to go the route of rolling Pick 3′s. I had placed the wagers via TVG in the morning and by noon I could tell the plan was going awry. The Mayor was dead in the first leg of the P5 and P4 so the atmosphere in the place was all about eating and watching the stories in between the races.
And coming back it's still the same,
Battle for the Planet of the Apes is almost embarrassingly minimalist in sets and casting. The former can be rationalized by the setting being a post-nuclear war Ape City and a completely destroyed forbidden City of radiation humans who will eventually become those bomb worshipers of the 40th century. The casting is a little harder to defend. Perhaps they broke the bank hiring the legendary John Huston to play the lawgiver. Outside of movie star Roddy McDowall, the cast was made up of television stars like Claude Akins and diminutive singer Paul Williams as apes. But come on--it is Sheriff Lobo and the guy who wrote “Rainy Days and Mondays.” Surely you cannot really say that is a big step down from television stars James Franciscus and eric Braeden of previous films?
Help make this amazing all female anthology – WOMANTHOLOGY – the vision of artist Renae De Liz – a reality via kickstarter.
This is my first iteration of my final project. I’m not that impressed with it, I think I need to work on my Photoshopping skills a little bit more. I was experimenting for two views: the portrait view and the candid view, and the class decided that the uniformity of the candid view worked better because it really shows how different the shadows are because the people are basically the same.
Andrew's FIRST Job, was with Laura. She owned a nearby Historical Chapel-where she proceeded (as an ordained Minister and daughter of a Methodist Minister) over many a Wedding. Andrew started working for her back in his early teens, doing yardwork/painting/maintenance.
The response to my posts yesterday and the day before about the BBC Radio Two Folk Awards has been quite astonishing... It looks as if I put my finger on something that had been troubling a lot of people for a while.
I introduced my wife to Myrtle the other day. We were driving near the cemetery, and I said, “Hey, I still haven’t taken you to meet Myrtle. Would you like to?” “Sure,” answered my wife. My daughter piped up, “Can I go see my friend David?”
It’s creamy, sweet but not too sweet, ginger-bready, cinnamon-y. Sigh. I checked online and it wasn’t available at any retailers in the Chicago area. So sad. But then – a miracle! I was in Aix, France last October, and I happened upon the Belgian original version, called Speculoos (they call the cookies Speculoos, too.) So I smuggled that home. And then, this holiday season, I saw the Biscoff brand of spread at Cost Plus World Market! I happily bought jars for several food-loving friends, and was still enjoying my own little stash of the stuff. And then last weekend, I saw a version at Trader Joe’s! Yes – they have their own brand!
SWOON.
Looking at the lack of confidence that MMV showed in the drug, in 2007, Ranbaxy was taking a risk by continuing research because there was no guarantee that the final clinical trials would be successful. It deserves credit to have been brave enough to plough in a further $15 million (of which $1 million came from the Department of Science Technology) to bring Synriam to the market. Whether they did that to avoid losses or because they truly believed that Synriam was going to be successful, I am not sure.
A bumper week for me, with two stories going live online. The first is another success at the Brighton Community of Writers - my story, "A Night In with Zil" came joint third in their Short Story Competition. (Be advised, this piece contains strong language).
See what I mean, I can’t seem to stay on point.
AD: I’ve got a mortgage with them.
5) Surprised to find that I would have had another aunt on my father's side, but she was stillborn. For that matter, surprised and saddened by the number of children in my family tree who died young.
So much time, hurt and disappointment could be avoided if people stopped using this gentle lie, and instead told the truth.
Ask fans to share their links. It introduces members to members, lets me know what they like, and lets me know what they're interested in. My goal is for you to find each other. That way, I encourage them to leave comments, and you'll get a lot of engagement on the page. Then it's mining that page for data on what you want to talk about next time.
All ye fellow Indians, Happy Independence Day! Happy to be born free and to be living free. My mom was born in the year of the Quit India movement… and my parents celebrated the very first Independence Day as children. I always miss my grandmother who made delicious sweets every independence day. Today I saw a little girl jump up and down in the streets of Kodigehalli with a flag in either hand… a delightful sight. I am also proud that I am still an Indian celebrating the 15th of August, when many of my one-time close friends celebrate only the 4th of July with great fervour. To call India a ‘young’ democracy generally gets on my nerves., India is one of the oldest democracies in the world. So please don’t call it Bharata Mata’s birthday…
11. Dark is the Night.
I forgive myself that I have accepted and allowed myself to hold my past as more than me and thus feel powerless in the face of it without realizing that it’s just my memories as pictures and experiences that are keeping me stuck in the past
"I give up."
Arts Club, Chicago
Holy time of love
Although Anna chose colours and read the chart for me I don't think she could have quite managed the threading but I think a young teen crafter would love this book to pieces. The charms are quirky but nicely detailed and like I say the themes mean that putting together a project using several charms would be really good fun. I'd love to do a hair comb with the gnomes and toadstools. I can certainly see Anna and I adding further fairy like figures to this necklace and making it really special. The book is £10.99 which with a few packs of beads and some wire mean that you could acquire a new skill and some mighty cute little fan-dangles for less than £20. Pretty good huh?
True story*: sixty percent of this movie's budget was spent on duct tape. Also a true story*: so much duct tape was used during the making of Red, White & Blue that America had itself a national shortage of The Serial Killer's Favourite. Red, White & Blue is so sticky-tape happy that almost every character ends up tied up with the stuff at some point. There's a great scene in which angry Nate (Taylor) turns up outside a victim's house, several rolls of tape hanging off've his belt. I haven't seen so much duct tape used in a film since that one time I spent all evening** watching certain specialist videos on myvideo.
For the skin with acne in any case you must use only non-comedogenic products, ie products that don't disturb the skin and don't demage it. They don't clog pores or anything like that.
2 tablespoons water
I knew how The Opposite of Amber was going to end from the first page of the book. What I didn't know (and Gillian made me sweat and gnaw my nails to find out) was how she was going to get me there. Have no doubts, this is not a novel which pulls its punches. It deals with a very difficult subject indeed--and it does it sensitively and with great compassion. Ruby, the 'heroine' is a great character--memorably described by Gillian as 'spoiled voiceless'. I loved her--she is finely written, a truly rounded creation who reminded me a little of Laurie Halse Anderson's Melinda Sordino in Speak, (about which I have written elsewhere).
Just the worry of making sure a model would show up on time is tiring! I always have a moment after Alicia finishes up the makeup and hair, where I briefly freak out and say an inner, resounding "Don't fuck this up". Because at that point it's its really just up to me to prove to this model that she didn't waste her time driving over here on her day off. I feel like adding that bit of pressure is a good thing. Creative people thrive under pressure. So i woke up on Friday morning completely exhausted, having that oh-god-why-did-I-do-so-many-jobs-in-a-row-I'm-in-so-much-pain-right-now feeling. But I chugged some dayquil, took a couple pain pills and pushed through my last shoot at Griffith park. I was so sore, which made me realize that I do some strange poses when snapping shots. I'm flat on the ground, I'm hoping up on tables, I'm one legged against a wall. I must look very silly, but hey it gets the job done. I came back home on Saturday, feeling sick and I totally puked a couple times from exhaustion. hahah.. But everything went fairly smoothly.
We on walking street and without guide, we do see, smell (hehehe.. weird smell indeed) through the China Town (168 market). u can bargain here, good luck. We also reach Tutuban Mall, and saw a lot of Church here. Don't miss the oldest Church in City.. u may find interesting.
And....... (*drum roll, please!*)........ta-dah!
Later, Channel Four News broadcast started by trumpeting accounts of the racial tension, before reluctantly admitting that this murder probably wasn't racially motivated, suggesting that they had prepared the item before news of the arrests broke, and could not quite let the fantasy go.
“The bronze plan is not catastrophic coverage,” said Carvin, who represents the National Federation of Independent Business.
Blake Lively
* On Saturday it was my Dad's 60th birthday so all the family gathered at my parents house for a birthday buffet. This birthday was quite important to us all as two years ago my dad was diagnosed with cancer. When you hear that word 'cancer' you automatically think the worst-we certainly did. It scared the hell out us and we thought, this is it, we are going to lose our Dad. But he did remarkably well, he had all the chemo and was barely ill from it. He smiled his way through everything, even losing his hair. He was so strong which made us determined to be even stronger for him. He has been in remission for over a year now and so we were over the moon to be celebrating his 60th.
“My purpose behind writing it is to encourage people who are faced with a problem (medical or otherwise) to face it no matter how difficult it may be. Furthermore, to give readers some insight into what it's like to live with a progressive and debilitating disease that has no medical name.
I finally gave up and ask everyone to go sit in their chairs, and I pulled my chair up to the table. I ask the children if their Mommies and Daddies worked? They all started talking at once, telling me what their parents did. Once I quietened them down, I ask, "What do you think is Miss Bonnie's job?" Most of them just looked at me. One little girl look at me and giggled, "Silly Miss Bonnie, your don't have a job." Of course this started everyone giggling. Not quite the reaction I was hoping for.
Lost in my world;
We stopped about 2 hours south of Dallas for dinner at about 8 p.m., then again steered south to Huntsville, Texas. We finally arrived at the motel, and settled into our rooms.
(Two-week program: 450 rupees. Extended stay: 200 rupees a night.)
End of the road? Did I sit down and brood?
It's 10 years since the release of "donkey-punk" duo Powersolo's debut album, Lemon Half Moon. To mark the occasion, Kim Kix and The Atomic Child (aka the Railthin Brothers aka Kim and Bo Jeppesen) have released their fifth album, Buzz Human. It's a generally great and always entertaining mash of psychobilly, 60s garage rock, punk, psychedelia, utter madness and catchy hooks.
You don’t have to spend a penny online today and it is FREE to sign up to Give As You Live via the page above. I am acting as an ambassador for them and fundraising for the Royal British Legion. However, you can join via the link above and then choose the charity you wish to support as we all have our own favourites.
Star Charm: My Mind's Eye Bits and Pieces
This timeless classic still gets you going when you hear that opening note of the first sound of the film (no, I can’t spell it). Unforgettable characters, an unforgettable story, great songs, comedy and animation, this one is one that you still love but don’t want to admit you still love.
Fiesta Babies march on parade
I think that Rakkofsky’s mishaps demonstrate why this rule makes good sense. His gripes essentially stem from a failure to receive important documents. Which is exactly what the bona fide office rule is meant to do – make it clear to the court, adversaries, and clients where an attorney can be reached. You know how they say in football that when you have 2 quarterbacks, you have no quarterback? Well, perhaps sometimes when you have 5 offices, you have no office.
In a few weeks it will be the time of the winter solstice. A solstice is a time when a given season generates the power of “redemption,” a time when the Earth, due to the extreme cosmic and astronomical events that are bombarding the planet at any given time. This bombardment can throw a season off balance. For example, it may be a bright, warm day outside, but the season is actually winter. The day is “out of season,” you see. So whether you experience this kind of “out-of-place” temperature and light, it would be good for you to remember the word “redemption.” The Lords of Redemption, i.e. the Lords of the Four Seasons, and the Lord of Winter will indeed re-create and bring the proper and natural energies about. This can be a long and difficult process, but sometimes it is not. The reason for this is that the imbalance that can be experienced, in our example, is causing the energies of the seasons (heat) must be stronger so that the energy of low heat can be transformed into what is normal to the season, in this case, winter. The biological part of all Nature’s form require four full and balanced seasons in order to live in harmony and accordance with the entities that are Mother Nature and Father Sky.
He said that the ANC had been "very good" at establishing a political system and the Constitution, but had not done well in economics.
We believe that cycling preserves resources. Switch to cycling and save the money you would otherwise spend on fuel and fares.
As much as he tried to deny it to himself, he knew why he was attracted to that tale.
So as I was standing on the platform singing, heart thumping in panic as I desperately argued with God about raising my hands, He reminded me that they were pure and that He desired to use them right then. So I did what a moment before had been the impossible, the unthinkable, and began to raise them. As I lifted my hands, I felt a spiritual heaviness pressing down on them; but Jesus said, “I’m helping you lift a spirit of oppression off worship in this church.” So I kept lifting them higher and higher until I felt free! Free of the shame that had been on my hands, an excitement of worship, and a sense of joy and victory that only comes through obedience.
Riley squirmed.
I had to live in "The Hinterlands" :')
Think. Quiet time is time well-spent. Jack asked good questions and took this time to think through good answers. He also knew that some questions would not be answered in this life, but that contemplation has value anyway.
Fear has many guises in this world: Hate, jealousy, anger, envy, judgement, control over others, manipulation and the list can go on and on.
The FCO also stated that the government supported “an orderly transition to a democratic system … to meet the legitimate aspirations of the Egyptian people.”
Now on the surface, his words could have been taken as a compliment. But it was the rolling of his eyes, the resignation on his face and his doleful tone that conveyed something quite different. And the muffled chuckles of other family members reinforced his opinion. You see, our friend’s mother is a great person, but is also known to talk – quite a lot!
The fact that an issuer of perpetuals can forgo a dividend payout without triggering default also places a big emphasis on the features to protect investors if such an event occurs.
Neil: Coated.
Change of dinette seating
Next, mix in the eggs at a low speed. Add one at a time and blend just until incorporated. Scrape the sides as needed.
They make terrible guard dogs. Unless their initial appearance scares an intruder, they are usually more eager to make a new friend. This makes them easily stolen, usually by the morons who fight them.
He searched dog-eared books, bare cupboards, bursting churches, tranquil ponds and rousing taverns. He roared at the sky and mumbled to himself and he learned nothing.
And finally . . . I have some exciting news! My daughter Brooke is engaged! My new son (I don't like the term son-in-law) will be Brice Sprayberry and we couldn't be more thrilled! Brice surprised us all when he asked Brooke to be his bride at Battery Park in Charleston on September 15 . . . but I wasn't surprised at all when she said YES! They are the perfect couple and I pray God's blessings on them both for a long, wonderful life together! Thanks for spending a little time with me today! Hope you all have a wonderful weekend....fall is in the air!
We talked about the men in the box playing cricket, and it was clear that she knew about cricket but not about TV. She answered my questions thoughtfully, even respectfully, as though she owed them more consideration than I was used to. I was 24 and to most of the patients I looked like a teenager. I was called a young whipper snapper often enough that year (and once, by another confused person, a young whipper snipper …). But Margaret was treating me as if I was older than her.
Well, its only actually really rained for 24 hours, and Monday this week wasn't altogether too bad, but somehow, the last week or so has felt like a bit of a rainy day or a Monday, due to having a tooth pulled out and the after effects of that little joy!
Can truly be full and free to live".....
Yep, it's that time . . .
and set them patting softly my secret shame.
While the bugs may not be her thing, boats apparently are. Elizabeth topped out at 5 boat rides in one day. It was all she talked about leading up to the getaway and all she ever wanted to do. If we couldn't get there by boat - we weren't going!
It's just a question of, when you speak, actually knowing what you are saying and writing down the correct words.
Just a reminder that we already start our second challenge with "Throw on those flower" theme ^^ The winner will get 3 digis from us and the top three cards we picked will each get 1 free digi! Check our lovely DT works in our Challenge Blog to get some new inspirations! You don't even have to use our digi to join the challenge, so... let's have fun together!
The Horse Show: A Training Ground for Virtue, Endurance, and Dirt Tolerance...
And Steinem had a good line – speaking on a panel about women leaders, moderated by Facebook chief operating officer Sheryl Sandberg, she speculated on why some men feel uncomfortable with females in power.
Let chicken sit for one hour until it's about room temperature.
Morning Glory Diner.Despite the general rule about a bad website = a bad experience, diners should be exempted. I don’t need Flash player; I want want S’More waffles, frittatas
This makes enough for two batches. I usually freeze the other half.
E're half my days, in this dark world and wide,
Dad had sent checks for a while, I found out later, but they’d finally stopped coming and David had had to take a job working at the Jiffy Lube three days a week keep us afloat. We didn’t talk about it much, but I could tell it was changing him, making him different. He didn’t smile as much, and we didn’t laugh and wrestle and joke around like we used to. More and more, he seemed to be somewhere else, in his head. Looking back, now, I can see how he was starting to remind me a little bit of Mom, and a little bit of Dad. Even when he was there, he wasn’t. Not really.
At first, I didn’t want to make this announcement. Believe it or not, I’m extremely shy and I hate to boast about anything. But I feel this will give others encouragement to keep writing and keep pressing forward—no matter how many rejection letters they get, no matter how many people say they can’t do it. It’s a test to see how strong you are and the training is beyond necessary for what lies ahead. Even though I’ve overcome many obstacles, plenty more wait for me behind the open door of opportunity. For now, I will celebrate each victory as it comes and I invite all of you to join me.
Royal the pageant closes,
To assess time perspective, participants were asked such questions as whether they enjoy reminiscing about the "good old days" or whether they believe their future is determined by themselves or by fate.
God save Tudor houses, antique tables, and billiards
blogspot family my cast duck tape
I started off with the house brewed Oatmeal Stout served on nitrogen. A little roasty for my taste, it was an easy drinker.
One day I came across this verse for the millionth time and decided to finally put some obedience to it by applying it.
4) Unrelated, but a Mr. David Gurvitz tried to use the ADL spy files to expose a rival as an Israeli spy, because he too wanted a job at the Simon Wiesenthal Center for Holocaust Studies.
any experience we had on the summit.
We hate the fact that you always take humanity out of the equation when discussing civilization, and constantly attempt to take away our rights of self defense. We hate that you wish upon all of us a system devoid of reward for merit. We hate your support of race baiters who bring nothing but trouble and divisiveness. We hate your misogyny and we hate how you see the world through the lens of race, class and sexual orientation. We hate that you cannot grasp that if you do not, yourself, possess a right you cannot give that right to the government. But we hate, most of all, your hate of us, Liberty, Natural Law and Free Market Capitalism.
Yesterday was one of those days. The kind of day that presented a perfectly packaged opportunity for growth and gained wisdom; prompting me, stretching me, testing me...and frankly, I wasn't in the mood. What I really wanted to do was regress to child-like behavior; to kick and scream and cry until the Universe had heard enough and eventually surrendered to my antics. But I managed to contain myself and keep it together until shortly after 5:00pm when I walked into Phil's office and declared that we needed to go out for a drink. To which he replied: "Uh-oh. What's wrong?"
Carmel, IN 14709
United Breweries - UB Group Kingfisher Blue
This one, from Pinetree, was a test order. I'd read a lot of bad reviews online. Some people said it took weeks to get their order. Mine only took three days.
UDT to VARBINARY
Just found an unusual note here. The first part of the refrain line where you hear the title words is over a chord progression of I-iii-vi-I. The melody starts on the fifth scale degree for that first I chord, but then climbs up to the sixth degree (on the word "grows") for the iii chord.
‘Lolita’ is a brilliant excercise in the nature of point of view and truth. Events are manipulated, bent and exaggerated (even Humbert himself admits the way his memories colour events differently to how they might have happened). The reader is constantly aware that the memoir is trying to earn out sympathy for Humbert’s hideous actions and the bland truth will always be relatively unknown. Nabokov expertly and delightfully navigates the precarious line between truth and lies.
Pig Flyin' has smoked the squab breast with apple wood chips, the legs cooked confit in duck fat. They rest against a disc of polenta, as tiny snippets of enoki mushroom float lazily in the golden-hued broth.
Our neighbors reseeded their entire lawn and put hay over it to keep it warm or some shit (I don't pay attention...I just know it looks ridiculous). The Crazies were playing in the basement and all of the sudden, I hear this racket. Hailey comes sprinting up the stairs yelling, "HEY!!! IT'S SNOWING!!!!"
Just because the NotW has closed due to apparent illegality by its staff, this does not establish that, IN THIS CASE, there was such illegality.
As for me, I'm stockpiling KitKats, Oreos and Eskimo bars. If the goo-goos want to take my confections away from me, they'll have to pry them from my warm, sticky fingers.
Also, I’m sure being a Reverend you’ve attended a good deal of charity events: could you help me choose what food to have at the party? Right now I was thinking fluffernutters, Fancy Feast (fish), Mountain Oysters, and probably call up IHOP and get a few orders of Rooty Tooty Fresh ‘N Fruity (it’s one of my favorite dishes). What do you think about those?
Me: I like to help my kids get what they want.
Sound all too familiar? Yes - Great Britain 1997 onwards......
Holy time, holy nation
Quaerere Tiresiae: venus huic erat utraque nota.
I was served a 10oz snifter. The beer poured a very nice ruby-red color with not much head at all. There were so many different aroma's I'm not sure I could pick them all out, berries, citrus fruit, brown sugar and florals all came to mind.
Lately, I have been finding all sorts of ideas and recipes for protein powder. Spark People has a list of 15 new ways to use protein powder, which definitely got my recipe creating brain thinking. The recipe that intrigued me the most? The protein cookie! I am going to have to create a recipe for that.
Please Leave 1 Comment for ALL of the possible entries!
Every little thing has to have a plus and a minus. And you have to be consistent. The second you break your own rules, the reader loses that suspended-disbelief and snaps out of the story. And in a series it’s twice as critical. You have to keep notes. You have to keep the rules the same in Book Five as they were in Book One. People laugh at me when they see me reading my own books–some probably assume I’m being pretentious. But the truth is, my memory is TERRIBLE (just ask my kids). My “author copies” are full of highlighting and notes–like how dragon lines are matriarchal and the females possess more power than the males, or how only a family member can bind someone in service to the sea-goddess, Cilaniestra… (These came up in Book Three, Lycan Tides, and are now coming full circle back around into what will hopefully be Book Six, God of Fyre Mountain.)
Those who cynically drafted the legislation in the way they did, did so in the knowledge that, when it comes to employment legislation, the majority of employers err on the side of caution. They are confident that, once this bill becomes law, human resources departments across the land will adopt a default “If in doubt don't employ the white guy” policy.
It feels un-natural and false. I can feel the muscles in my face working too hard for such a simple response. He glares in the direction of my left ear. Eye contact still escapes him. His hands stop hammering his thighs. He takes a step forward and hisses at me like a cat. From my right side I hear a little girl giggle. I watch as he swings his head in her direction and hisses again. The little girls face crumples in folds of tearful indecision, then her skin smoothes, as she attaches a clinging hand to the back of her mothers legs. let my eyes trace the outline of the mothers dress as I lift my head up to see her face. She is staring at my son. Her face distinctly hostile.
Are there any indications about next week's theme?
Mahek: – Yes. To attend the marriage of Nikhil and Sony.
But that person I had become was grieving and it became very clear to me very quickly that grieving was not a process—at least not a process as most of us have come to think of the term. It was neither rational nor linear. It had an almost unidentifiable beginning, but a beginning sometime before Howard’s actual death. It could not be flow charted, Gantt charted, or PERT diagramed. There was no chain of events as predictable as Kubler-Ross suggested in her theory on dying and death.
I know a performance would drive a player to practise more, but I thought I would focus on what’s working better with the limited time I have.
During the Q&A session, there was an animated debate on the lack of cooperation and coherence between the different Member States. Also, some questions were raised about the current problems with CCS demonstration plants and the energy saving targets.
for you love all humankind,
They added the pair had no plans to travel to Spain until investigators had examined the information further.»
3) Don't yell things at the computer such as, "Find that file or I'll show you what you can do with your gigabytes!" Or any other thing that would make the neighbors question my sanity.
The channels through which these energies flow, and the systems managing the energies, are not physical systems. They cannot be seen with our naked eye or physically located in the human body. This is the main reason why there is still much skepticism from mainstream medicine on the concept and role of subtle energy in our health and wellness — even if it has been used by ancient healing traditions long before the birth of science and Western medicine. See related article, The Role of Subtle Energy in Health and Wellness for 2012 and Beyond.
r outrageously, only, etc) became rich and famous .
But there's a snag (that surprised you didn't it?). A well used laptop will often run out of amps and volts within a working day. So, as one would, the lawyers will charge them from a convenient point. Snag? Many court managers refuse to allow stuff to be plugged into an HMCTS socket unless said stuff has been safety tested and bears the appropriate sticker. Even the -wait for it- kettle in our clerks' rest room has to be solemnly checked and have its sticker attached each year. (Thought - since Tescos do a kettle for well under a tenner, isn't that less than the facilities company will charge for the test and the paperwork?) .
I can just imagine it attached to the wall on a back porch long ago.
5. The Doctor once spent a revealing evening with Frank Sinatra, Einstein and Father Christmas.
You should also know that if a large failing bank were to be Nationalized, the stockholders would take the hit, but the account holders would not. In other words, if you have an account in one of these banks, it will remain intact. Whether or not limits would be set on how and when money can be removed remains to be seen. It has happened with some of these banks that have failed in order to quell “Runs” on the money. So it would be a LOT easier to check your bank’s status now than to worry about it later. Of course, a bank’s rating can change as well, from bad to better or from good to not-so-good. So it’s best to check back every so often.
It is amazing.
In a universe as vast as it is mysterious, a small but powerful force has existed for centuries. Protectors of peace and justice, they are called the Green Lantern Corps. A brotherhood of warriors sworn to keep intergalactic order, each Green Lantern wears a ring that grants him superpowers. But when a new enemy called Parallax threatens to destroy the balance of power in the Universe, their fate and the fate of Earth lie in the hands of their newest recruit, the first human ever selected: Hal Jordan. Hal is a gifted and cocky test pilot, but the Green Lanterns have little respect for humans, who have never harnessed the infinite powers of the ring before. But Hal is clearly the missing piece to the puzzle, and along with his determination and willpower, he has one thing no member of the Corps has ever had: humanity. With the encouragement of fellow pilot and childhood sweetheart Carol Ferris, if Hal can quickly master his new powers and find the courage to overcome his fears, he may prove to be not only the key to defeating Parallax… he will become the greatest Green Lantern of all.
As many of you might remember - I had the great pleasure of participating in the "Haute Dog Fashion Show" a few weeks back - a charity event to raise money for Canine Companions for Independence. It's been a crazy few weeks since the event - but I wanted to share a little background . . . and some great images of the night . . .
They hardly meant has come to be
Ellen Rose, University of New Brunswick, Catherine Adams, University of Alberta, Corey Anton, Grand Valley State University, and Stacey Irwin, Millersville University
Appearing before reporters at the White House, Obama said he had been willing to agree to a deal that was more generous to Republican interests than to those of his fellow Democrats. “It’s hard to understand why Speaker Boehner would walk away from this kind of deal,” he said. “The vast majority of the American people believe we should have a balanced approach” between revenues and cuts.
General notes:
The first picture was scanned from the amazing hardcover book "The Doctor Who Illustrated A-Z" by Lesley Standring, 1985. Click the image to view it in epic proportions.
Place pitted dates in bowl of food processor; puree until thick paste forms. Add cocoa powder, chia seeds, and vanilla and almond extracts. Pulse until all ingredients are combined. Add almonds; pulse until nuts are finely chopped and well distributed through date mixture.
Here is an extract, the first paragraph of Corn Dolly Dead.
Bogdan Gutkowski, President of BIG, imagines the project will have an impact on numerous areas besides the region’s tourism. “Water Discus Hotel project opens many new fields of development for the hotel and tourism sector, housing and city sector in the coastal off-shore areas, as well as new opportunities for ecology support by creation of new underwater ecosystems and activities on underwater world protection,” he told World Architecture News. “Additionally we would like to create here in the UAE the International Environmental Program and Center of the Underwater World Protection – with Water Discus Hotel as a laboratory tool for oceans and seas environment protection and research.”
CD/DVD – 4.75 inches
and they're off!
Thank you all for another wonderful session! It has been such a pleasure working with you all!
And why not, she wondered? Because she was not impulsive. Because she had a respect for rules that she did not like to admit to and which annoyed her: a respect borne of fear. Part of her would have loved to jump in with him. Another, bigger part, told her that the moment she did so, a Water Board van would pull up in the layby. Men in uniforms would come and tell them off, or worse. She envied John his careless sense of freedom.
My second resolution was to start up this Blog. My goal is to log on at least 3-4 times a week and submit all the funny and crazy things that go on in my day. Let me tell you that I could type all day on all the funny / stupid things I see. The main purpose of me starting this blogger website is so that I can log all the funny stuff that happens to me in my life.
“What! What nonsense!” the shift manager, Mr. Gallstable, spluttered. His tremendous mustache shook. “Tigers are black and orange with proper tails and teeth and claws. Make this machine make them properly, or you shall lose your job.”
They say it's your birthday.....doot n doot n doo doot......... it's my birthday too!
Our first performance at Governor’s School consisted of an exercise wherein twenty-four of us were monkeyish creatures, crawling around on the floor and improvising interaction with one another, while the other two lucky ones took turns reading the Preface aloud. It goes a little something like this:
David J. Hansen
Of course, the vast majority of those who had become involved with this group were no more than gullible tools, although the group did undoubtedly include a criminal element. Its effectiveness as a means of damaging the BNP has now run its course, and these days it causes us little trouble. There is no doubt, however, that at a crucial time beginning around 1993 and continuing till about 1996 its activities and its insidious campaign of poison and disruption did weaken us considerably. The timing of this 'scam' is important. It hit us just at the moment when we were poised to capitalise on our first election victory. I regard this as no accident...
As soon as I heard the topic for the challenge I knew that I wanted to make a card for a sweet little girl.
After that we walked across the Quarter to have dinner on Frenchment St at the Praline Connection, a little soul food restaurant. The food was fantastic and the popular dishes were Red Beans & Rice (well, it was Monday!) and fried chicken with a side of Mac & Chees. It was a great place to eat and pretty reasonably priced too. I appreciated the refills on the sweet tea! I myself enjoyed the Seafood Combination, oysters, crawfish and crab. yum!
I spent a few minutes fussing at myself for not paying attention. then realized that I should know how to fix this problem. Jane's TIAS goat flashed into my mind and I thought "Ah Ha!" I do know how to do this.
I've had many requests to share about how I organize my Treasures materials with all the games and pieces. Since we had a teacher workday on Tuesday, I took some pictures of how I am organizing everything.
A few messages ago, I mentioned carrying forward John's mission. I know that this is already being done by so many of you in the wonderful work you are already doing in the field of accessiilty. In addition, I am seeking input on how to create a focused project or direction for moving forward John's unique contributions.
Around this point Ao has been brought to their base where he is both interrogated and talks with the island’s apparent political leader, Kazuyuki Kaneshiro, who explains to him just why he’s despised by the other islanders, that Eureka had fallen from the sky thirteen years ago and around three years after Ao was born, while he was already seen as an alien there was a Scub Burst that only stopped when she was captured by the Americans, with Naru being one of a the few survivors of the families caught up. Even shamefully apologising for it. Following this Gazelle having thought on this and seeing the blame as misguided decides to do something, while Ivica has also arrived determined to find out whether Ao’s mother is the same woman he thinks she is. But before he can get his answer, Gazelle’s group crashes through the wall to rescue Ao, being revealed to be the Kazuyuki’s son and blaming his all talk attitude for their current pseudo independence.
distilled down to this dark pen
Jacqui who was forced to apologise to the House for using the second home allowance to fund her family home, and was publicly embarrassed by her husband's bill for pornographic films, has made more eye-catching claims. She billed the taxpayer for a £555.74 television, a £244.90 DVD player and £611 spent on a new double bed and mattress.
That will allow them to tell the truth about Islam and Muhammad. In doing so we will expose this dangerous ideology and its founder. We must encourage Muslims to leave Islam and to choose for freedom and prosperity.
Holy nation, God see
At the moment this is the crossroad at which I stand and I’m not sure of the direction to take except to keep moving toward Jesus, which is wisdom for any of us. I want to get to as many places as possible, I want to serve and reach as many as possible and I continue to trust God to make that happen. I am looking for wisdom from the body at this point as well.
After Cocteau had given me the names on a piece of paper, I returned to my cabin and considered the facts logically. It didn’t take me long to deduce that the Frenchman’s hunch about Giovanni Pozzella was an idée fixe of the weakest calibre. A purser of ten year’s service would not risk his career to play juvenile games. Furthermore, mere possession of the passenger list would not have yielded him the required intelligence. The hoaxer must have observed that each pair of victims were on terms of sufficient cordiality to make the sentiments expressed in the note remotely plausible. And while the ship’s purser might have guessed of the amorous longings that heaved within the ample bosom of Miss Geldenhuis, he could not have possessed similar insights for the other guests on Cocteau’s list.
It's all a bit overwhelming! Not necessarily in a bad way, of course--I'm proud of Dexter, and the Christmas songs are wonderful to hear, and I'm excited to be finishing the work of teaching a class (or three), and it'll be good for Patrick not to have exam week hanging over him during the break. It's just a bit much when it all comes at once.
At the EU level, novel legislation is in the making. First, the Border Measures Regulation 1383/2003 is under revision. The commendable aims of the review are the simplification and modernization of the procedures to reduce costs for right-holders, and a maximum harmonization of national customs administrations practices. No draft is yet available, but the Commission, under the threat of a WTO panel following a brawl over seizures of medicine in transit, has announced that it will delete every hint to what could be interpreted as a ‘manufacturing fiction’. Furthermore, the ‘simplified procedure’ will be mandatory and the de minimis exception for infringing goods in personal baggage will be repealed. Secondly, the draft Directive on Criminal Sanctions for IPR Infringements is to be revived further to the entry into force of the Lisbon Treaty. Given the increasing involvement of criminals in counterfeiting and piracy, there is a need for harmonized penal measures and cross-frontier investigation procedures. Again, the European Parliament must endorse the text and is likely to have its say. Thirdly, the stakeholder dialogue and the discussions in the EU Observatory on counterfeiting and piracy are ongoing and the results are eagerly awaited. Finally, the Court of Justice of the European Union (CJEU) will have to decide on the two questions for preliminary ruling submitted in Nokia and Philips where the ‘manufacturing fiction’ is at stake. The CJEU must clarify the conditions under which right-holders can take action against fake goods in transit under the Border Measures Regulation (a crucial question, since 40 per cent of the articles seized at EU borders are declared as being in transit). It is not certain that the outcome of the case will allow right-holders to come out victoriously. If the Border Measures Regulation is revised and every reference to the ‘manufacturing fiction’ deleted, the reference to the CJEU is a dead end. Whatever the outcome may be, a review of the substantive IP legislation is necessary to allow right-holders to take effective action against fakes in transit.
1. I saw Hope–that this group could do something significant. They are only 9 churches, but are full of first generation Christians. They remember conversion and are desirous of others to experience it. When Frantz their leader shared an ambitious plan to see 20 new churches established over the next 10 years there was applause and shouts of amen! 20? Really? 2 per year? Really? Yep, Frantz thinks it can be done. (Who brings hope to your group? Who brings hope to you?)
And when it's melted in the milk allow the lot to cool.
File and sand the edges of the disks until all fabrication marks are gone and thee disks are smooth enough to be worn as jewelry. For instructions on how to file and sand when making jewelry, see our tutorials How to Use a File for Jewelry Making and How to Use Sand Paper.
The train passes and the song changes. I check the time.
In the prayer in the Garden of Gethsemane, we are shown that we too, are to submit to the will of the Father. It is not, our will, but His, that should be done.
is one very big nose!), my hand for attention.
In this chapter, well I’m not going to tell you today. That would spoil the surprise.
I just go and sit beside him. Can he see through me? To cast a spell, I make the cutest baby face and bored droopy eyes making my intention loud and clear; the only thing left now is to bat them lovingly. He looks at me, the gaze has frozen, is he falling for it? It is intense now and he says, “Wasn’t he out!” and I feel like dislodging the bails myself. Here goes the perfect plan in the ditch and I am left hanging by the threads of the same pompoms I was about to set on fire.
I’m not sure what anyone can do from this point onwards. Voting closed on 30th April; now I think the judges just cogitate and ruminate on the finalists before naming their champion of champions on the 22nd June.
The whole thing starts at 7:30pm, ends at 9:30pm, costs $5 to get in, and takes place at The Make Out Room: 3225 22nd Street, between Mission and Valencia, San Francisco. Here's a map. That's Saturday, December 8, 2007.
I was a tad dilated at my last checkup, so I am now supposed to watch out for labor signs and hope that we go just a little bit longer! We're hoping 3-4 weeks so they can fatten up some more in there! We'll do a growth check up next Thurs, 10/27. Hoping they'll have put on another half to three quarters of a pound these past two weeks!
I think not, my reputation’s soiled;
1 matching
Hope people are finding this useful.its taking a long time to do..though fun rereading old posts..
From what I know of depression and suicide, this is a gross exaggeration of how it goes down. It makes for compelling cinema, but wildly misrepresents folks who struggle with suicidal thoughts. So dramatic, the naked torso and the wreathed crown.
Chokepoint 1 – How to stop a goddamn oil tanker
Vaughan Scott
Luckily, I remembered Papillote. Every other mechanism I had tried has failed me as far as these darned fishes were concerned. Somehow I never ended up did a papillote with Tilapia. For those of you who are sneering at my casual use of a foreign word without explaining it (:) :), papillote is an excellent (french) way of baking whole (or filleted) fishes in pouches. A drizzle of oil, a few tomatoes a fresh lovely fish, a tightly sealed pouch and you get a Pappilote. It is one heck of a way to have a wholesome rustic meal without fanfare. Of course the original recipe demands a flavorful fish that can carry the recipe.
Now I may be many things but “a monomaniac fruitcake” is not one of them. I am a polymaniac, being obsessed variously with bad television, poorly produced adverts, and a desperate bid to get on the telly. I will not rest until my pseudonymous name is cleared. I have today instructed my lawyer (myself) to get an absolutely fantastic injunction (two levels up from a super-injunction).
For businesses, this is a time to get out there and meet the community. It is the chance to interact with people, and make contact with potential clients and customers in a way that advertising can never do. These festivals allow vendors to bring a personal touch and interaction into the products and services that they offer, on a higher level helps to grow that sense of community we all seek.
Interview by Yvan Amar
The Lord of the Coliseum was waiting with his fingers crossed. If Ambie had applied to use the Coliseum, he would then reject it, citing that the Coliseum was meant to be a place for children. “Adults are not allowed,” he was preparing his script.
½ cup (4 oz/115 gm) granulated white sugar
Samsung Electronics unveiled a new top-of-the-range Galaxy Smartphone in London updating the most direct competitor to Apple's iPhone with a larger touch screen and more powerful processor.
The taste itself, I couldn’t describe it, since I just got a very few. Yes the meat wasn’t bad, but I find the veggies aren’t fresh. And since they took so long to send any utensils other than the chopstick. We decided to go when they give our soup spoon, and when it comes, all the soup is all eaten. And there are no rice. Until I asked, when they finally send the rice, I already has nothing to eat it with, and we already called the bill to pay our drinks. Oh, for the drinks we order the flavored tea, I order the apple tea, and it taste ordinary.
"Head Computer" from Vol. 2 gets the treatment from Greencarpetedstairs, who takes the burbling bassline and b-boy electro-funk and drops it down a well. Its like listening to a rave going on in the basement of the hotel where yr trying to sleep, with the occasional punctuation of blood-curdling screams making you wish you had shelled out the extra six dollars for the HoJo by the airport. Venacavaca's version of "New Violence" sounds like a vengeful spirit hanging in the air around the midnight ninja strike of the original's bassline. A bad omen. "Dark Days (drift station remix)" takes "Dark Ages" chopped-and-slurred soul vox and taut, wiry beats and reconfigures it into a lo-fi girl group sing-a-long, finalizing the record with some glammy disco, before trailing off into the sunrise.
Edited by Valentine Cunningham
I think that any sexualising of clothing optional beaches is a concern because it plays into the hands of those members of the public that are gymnophobic and want to see the few clothing optional beaches that we have, closed. They equate nudity with sex and therefore where there is nudity, in their minds, there are rampant sexual orgies.
Odell Brewing Company Red
In my view the strongest force of all, one which grew and took fresh shapes and forms every day war, the force not of any one individual, but was that unmistakable sense of unanimity among the peoples of the world that war must somehow be averted. The peoples of the British Empire were at one with those of Germany, of France and of Italy, and their anxiety, their intense desire for peace, pervaded the whole atmosphere of the conference, and I believe that that, and not threats, made possible the concessions that were made. I know the House will want to hear what I am sure it does not doubt, that throughout these discussions the Dominions, the Governments of the Dominions, have been kept in the closest touch with the march of events by telegraph and by personal contact, and I would like to say how greatly I was encouraged on each of the journeys I made to Germany by the knowledge that I went with the good wishes of the Governments of the Dominions. They shared all our anxieties and all our hopes. They rejoiced with us that peace was preserved, and with us they look forward to further efforts to consolidate what has been done.
Jesus in the garden would have said this as he sweated great drops of blood, Jesus on the cross said into your hands I commend my spirit he gave it up no one could take it. Jesus trusted his Father in Heaven. If you’re not a Christian this message is not for you. You don’t trust God anyway or you would believe and repent unto salvation.
As a result of those poorly designed shoes, as well as lowtop baby shoes in general, my baby boy went barefoot in summer and wore feet pajamas in cooler months.
Usage – You have harbored illusions about life since your childhood.
I've been in only one hurricane, Hurricane Betsy, back in mid 1960s, in New Orleans. Once was enough.
Homeschool is going well. This is not to say it isn't without bickering, fussing, and driving the teachers crazy; but there is more learning then ever going on. And this is the part I really love. I realize right now...how much I really LOVE being their teacher when they are focused on learning. It's not so fun when they are whining and bickering. And it's really, really hard when the boys are home....our school is done best when boys are at THEIR school.
Too Much Pussy! Feminist Sluts, a Queer X Show 2010 Documentary Movie Watch Online : Vidreel Link : Alternative Link :
As they grew into their teenage years it was found that the surgeries and the hormone treatments and weekly memory “sharing” had succeeded in creating a group of young people who were intelligent and pliable and thought of themselves as neither male nor female.
A big buzz when Samsung Galaxy S2 out at Korea and now worldwide is crazy about it (except Apple fanboys :P). Here is all sort of stuffs that you need to know about Galaxy S2. It would be my dream phone (for now...) but my stock price haven't hit the price that enough for me to buy one yet. :P
The 660ml & the 355ml are US stalwarts, more commonly known as 'Bombers' & '12oz' ers respectively, then we have the UK standards 500ml & 330ml & a couple of odd sizes in 375ml & 750ml (champagne sized bottle).
Well, there has always been a number of debates, there’s nothing new about it, actually. Naturally, if the resources are scarce, and they’re allotted one way, the people who didn’t get what they wanted will have criticisms. That is a perfectly necessary and essential feature of any government arts support policy.
Cast : Bill Paxton, John Broadwater, Lori Johnston, Charles Pellegrino, Don Lynch, Ken Marschall, James Cameron, Mike Cameron, Jeffrey N. Ledda, Corey Jaskolski, Jason Paul, Eric Schmitz, Genya Chernaiev, Victor Nischeta, Anatoly M. Sagalevitch
Lots of people assume that getting photo ID is no big deal. Most people have it, and even the ones who don't can easily get it. After all, it's free! But that's not true. First, you need a birth certificate. Middle-class folks might not realize this, but not everyone has a birth certificate handy, and both the hassle factor and the cost of getting one can be real deterrents. Add to that the hassle of getting a ride to a DMV office two counties away during working hours, and voting in the next election suddenly got a whole lot harder for you than it is for your average middle-class white suburbanite. You might even never get around to it. ( Kevin Drum – The Poor are Stupid and Helpless) You need that stuff to get a job and to be a responsible citizen! How do these helpless people get to the polls? How do they get out of bed and feed themselves on their own? How do they find their ass with both hands?
The Prime Minister has made a habit of defending the indefensible, misleading the house about his influence-gathering, and leaving most people in doubt as to the value of his word. The swift execution of Hunt advisor Adam Smith (for doing his boss’s bidding?) looks like a case of the sacrifical snake. It seems in many ways to sum up what Camerlot now seems to be about as a form of Government: the leg up, the nod and wink, the cash in hand, the dinners for the starf*ckers, and the refusal to be accountable.
10. A magic spell/science experiment has gone awry, and you’re a mermaid/man for the rest of the week. How stoked are you?
And every smile upon your face, as you spit on her in your disgrace.
The question itself is innocuous enough, and I don't think she meant any harm. She merely asked "At what point will you put your kids back in school?" Simple, right? Right. But like most questions, this one has both a short answer and a long answer. The short answer was "It is not my choice to have them in school or out of school, it is their choice; if they decide to go back, I will support them. That's how this works."
I know that feeling. There are some things you just don't want your other half knowing about you. Sod stretch marks and VPL and the fact that you only shave to your knees if they knew what you read...well that's getting just too personal. I don't care that I have been married to him for nigh on 13 years I don't like any censure when I read. I don't like people....
She’s great, we got on straight away, though I don’t suppose that was such a surprise.
d. 149:1, 9
06 - Cosmic Force
In case you’re like me, and you’ve been missing out, “Beem-bomisms Friday – The Ludicrous Hamburger” was posted earlier, and can be viewed here.
I know others have suggested this to you before, but I'll go ahead and do it again: have you considered having a maid/cleaning service maybe once every couple of weeks or so?
1 tablespoon brown sugar
2: Happy Birthday to my big sister! She is 27 today. We are 17 months apart...so whenever her birthday comes around, it reminds me that very soon I will be exactly where she is; slowly creeping into my late 20's. Not that there is anything wrong with that, but it is so shocking. I remember having "middle finger night" with my siblings when all 5 of us still shared a room over 20 years ago. Wow, I'm old. :)
I am back today with an entry to the Monday memories prompt. This weeks idea was remember a gift you have been given.
“Caught that, did you? So did I. Still. I really think we’re way too imaginative. Besides, I’m hungry. Let’s stop and pick up some food, then head back to your house.”
SSRN has again been named the Number 1 Open Access Repository in the World (for January, 2011) by the Ranking Web of World Repositories (http://repositories.webometrics.info/toprep.asp). Our thanks to all of the SSRN authors who helped make this happen.
Neither Mr. B or I have ever done this kind of work. And I confess: I can be pretty impatient and rude when I know how to do something, or know only a little bit about how to do something (but don't want anyone to know I DON'T know 'cause I don't want them to think I'm dumb - I know...something I need to work on). But what I discovered through the fence building project was that it was a lot easier to have fun and enjoy the hard work when just giving in to that ignorance, doing my best with the knowledge I have and enjoying the give and take of working together with Mr. B with shared leadership in a project.
* A snorkel
3. Celebrating Aaron's 4th birthday next week
Speaking of toothbrushes. Let’s put those on the list of things the Smartards have ruined for me. Remember what it used to be? It used to be a brush. For your teeth. That’s it. A fuckin’ brush.
The Broad Wall shows where the city was expanded to
When I am not committed enough to my own vision I get distracted by that of others
God is gone.
Whenever something like this happens in the media (the story, not the puns),
.friends you thought you knew
Here's the images that I omitted from my past blog posts for obvious reasons, the first one due to the foreground overhead cables of a light rail system and the second due to the narrow road and high elevation of the building.
I’ve been watching anything from kids cartoon movies to love stories – but each one has had an underlying ‘life coaching’ theme. Whether this be never give up, keep motivated or follow your dreams, each movie has left me feeling that bit better!
I am Playing Along in These Challanges:
"Open minds, open innovation Not so many years ago, the term “open innovation” was unknown to the intellectual property community. While the concept existed, there was little evidence that it existed, or that it was likely to gain any currency at all, before the publication in 2003 of Henry Chesburgh's Open Innovation: The new imperative for creating and profiting from technology. Since then, the term has gained momentum in common parlance. However it is only in the past year or two that open innovation is becoming something that is more widely and positively spoken of as something which a business might participate in, rather than as something rather strange and risky, to be indulged in by others — preferably in North America and the Asia-Pacific.
cow’s tongue, too
The inquest of Gareth Williams has given the public a tiny glimpse of what goes on at GCHQ, MI6 and how the Met doff their hats to the masters at MI6.
11 female
Original Function: driving and all around farmers’ dogs
Make them wonder?
or just feeling down
Here is one more place to go for help. I haven’t used them before, but they come recommended – Book Looks
I really should start sending my stories in.
I'm still pregnant. Every single person I've known who had (yes, had!) a due date within 2 days of mine has already given birth. Early. They all have their birth stories and cute baby pictures up on Facebook with everyone cooing and awwing over their new arrivals. Yes, I'm glad for them...but I don't want to hear about it right now because not only do I not have my boy here yet, but it looks as if he's more than content to stay in there.
I have already made you the sindoor in the parting of my hair,
I came home to find this awful damage in our apartment…
Armed with an awesome Hako Soldering Iron, and the willingness to risk destroying a brand new microphone, I decided to proceed. Ordering parts is about the most frustrating part of the project due to the fact that you buy a $ 1.69 capacitor and pay $ 4.95 shipping, it seems that you can go broke on all the parts, because the vendors don’t have all the parts needed.
with a little yoga, lemon maté, a familiar face, and a spectacularly pink, purple, blue dusky sky, i became a pronoia enthusiast today.
I’m really looking forward to it.
The second is an optional change for when the guns come out. Technically this isn't really needed, NGR will handle guns just fine. I simply like it to add some variation.
What impressed you about my writing?
Reaching for something in the distance
Taku Unami has for several years now been one of the most interesting and unique musicians in avant-garde music, a clever conceptualist who is seldom content to operate in any one mode for long, and who distances himself from so many other high-concept sound artists because his ideas almost always yield fascinating sonic results rather than being interesting only as theory. Takahiro Kawaguchi is one of several likeminded musicians in the modern Japanese electroacoustic scene, less prolific and less well-known than Unami but promising in his own right; his 2009 solo album n, constructed entirely from ticking metronomes, is remarkable. Both artists have dabbled in the extreme minimalism of post-millennial Taku Sugimoto, and both artists have also expanded their palettes far beyond the self-imposed austerity of Sugimoto. Their first duo collaboration, Teatro Assente, is anything but minimal, though it certainly suggests that the musicians are still intimately concerned with the relationships between sound and silence that have driven so much modern improvisation-based music, both in Japan and elsewhere.
28. Poor Little Pigeon - Argosy All-Story Weekly 5 parts Aug 9, 16,
There are lots of new shops I have discovered, but today I'm going to focus on HALLOWEEN and THANKSGIVING ensembles. So its an all-skate of new and previously featured shops. A win-win I say.
What most concerns me right now is the over reach of the federal government into the education curriculum. The comeback is that "CCSS is voluntary! The feds didn't force this upon the states!" But the states were certainly coerced into adopting the standards; no adoption, no Race to the Top grant money and no chance for waivers of NCLB. That's some pretty serious arm twisting. And I don't agree with that part of it.
I spoke to a room full of rowdy teenagers this morning as part of Gen-Ignite’s theJourney internship program. We talked about the importance of a lifestyle of worship and some tips to engaging in a life-giving corporate musical worship experience. I’ll rehash that, at some point, but as I prepared, I couldn’t get away from an issue that was staring me right in the face.
I would hope this doesn't happen. If it does, then I also hope that she sues the arse of The People for running a campaign that could seriously harm her and her baby.
Serve warm or cold with cream, ice cream, custard or just by itself.
We came down to the States and planned a Canadian wedding from afar, while I started the paperwork to become a U.S. resident. We spent ten months bouncing back and forth between the two countries. We got married on a cool, rainy day on a farm in the greenest part of Ontario. The clouds racing across the sky and the rain spraying down in uneven spurts reminded us so much of rainy-season Korea. I had to smile thinking about it, for the hundredth time that day.
While I was not involved in a catastrophic accident last fall, I was sick and apparently had been for some time. It was a kind of sickness that has afflicted three members of my family, killing two. I’m the fourth. So, in December, a surgeon popped my hood and went to work.
And you chase the truth till every eye is open,
Those in the top 50 ranking will receive a $500 American Express gift card and be honored at an awards dinner co-sponsored by American Express OPEN and the WPO.
Oh the braxton hicks! They're back! I feel like I have to share at least a portion of my last experience with these suckers for people to understand why I am somewhat dreading their return.
OK Dad, here's the part where you can skip.
I swear I’m still alive.
I'm planning on crashing some of the talks at the Colorado Bicycle Summit. I'm crashing it because I don't have $85 to spend on a short conference. Also I would have to cancel class to attend the second day and that isn't going to happen.
One of the key benefits that entrepreneurs derive from working with a mentor or a team of mentors is moral support. The road to business success is filled with potholes and roadblocks.
We had a very informative day at the Conch Farm. This place typically grows about 3 million conch per year – it’s amazing….
At 2:40.
Though as temporary Beijingers/ex-New Yorkers we may hold our heads a little higher since ex-Knick Steven Marbury led his new team to victory in the Chinese Basketball Association finals a few weeks ago, life is still always just a little harder than usual:
So since I had no more faith, getting Bar Mitzvahed seemed like nothing more than a chance for my battling divorced parents to throw a big party so my embittered waring relatives could shower me with money and gifts and kill each other in a caged wrestling match. And when I began to push back about having to sing from a prayerbook written backwards and in Hebrew and walk around the synagogue holding a Torah over my head which looked like a double roll of paper towels in an ornate blue velvet and gold cover, my parents threatened me with no Bar Mitzvah. I took a deep adolescent sign of relief and thanked them. Now I had more time to masturbate.
According to the “About” page:
(oh, the bliss of this glorious thought),
Harvey & Son Ltd. Harveys Tom Paine Original Old Porter
Now make sure to pay attention... you can win these great stamps in two different ways. The first one is to go to the blogs of the fabulous Sweet November Gals and leave them a comment. If you do that you're name will go in the drawing twice at the blog of Amy!
At the time this aired in the U.S., a lot of folks tried to pin this particular bit on Cartoon Network, which completely ignores that Cartoon Network’s input was cash, not creative effort. So this one is completely on Sunrise, and it’s really pretty weird. Why put in such offensive caricatures of your in-group, after all? Or was this just supposed to be Sunrise poking fun at the stereotypes? Maybe it worked for Japanese folks, but to me it just feels crude and detracts from the remainder of the episode.
not this time.
An important science? What the fuck? Is this the 13th century? And more planets? Are there more planets out there? Gee, I dunno. What do the stars tell you? If you want more planets for astrology, just make some up. Fuck's sake, just add in satellites, and tell people that the "stars" are beaming messages directly to their heads. That's where Lydia Hammond, therapeutic astrologer, is getting her information from. "Important science," my ass. These idiots should just join up with the Intelligent Design people, they obviously have the same level of education in math, science, and history. Just substitute "God" for "stars" and you have the exact same mumbo-jumbo.
For that Barack Obama gets today’s well-earned shout-out…and this amusing artwork.
I think truly being a part of a community is about understanding how crucially intertwined we all are. People are very sensitive creatures, battling feelings of envy, fear, and insecurity. It comes down to a very basic principal of taking other’s emotions into account, treating others the way we want to be treated. No one wants to feel insufficient, but I think sometimes we can act in very insensitive ways that leave a wake of destruction behind us.
My friend and me spent also a lot of time in the various book shops of the TATE. I loved looking through all the wonderful titles and finding one fascinating one after the next. And look what I spotted on the Children’s Book section ;)
I also have gained about 11 pounds in the last 4 months. This is something I am working on through Weight Watchers with two great girl friends. I just started eating anything I wanted, and I am paying the price. Luckily, Mr. Justice has been a great sport about it. LOL. He does love his gourmet dinners, but now he will have to get used to a little less heavy cream and red meat.
When Dinah and Jeff move in to be the Wheillercarts’ companions, their lives change for the better and the worse. Dinah loves Jeff, but after five years together, he still refuses to marry her, and Dinah’s dreams of starting a family begin to crumble. Regardless of their hot lovemaking sessions, she fears Jeff is cheating on her. Dinah will do anything to keep Jeff, even if it means sharing him with another woman.
More questions loomed.
born: August 18, 1928
So, I am going to prepare some good old-fashioned country-style roast potatoes in lard, with their crispy, cracklin coat. Yum! Then some pastry shells for quiche ... then frying some eggplant ...
I find that PeopleofWalmart.com showcases a pretty representative sample of what average Americans think is appropriate to wear out in public, so I was baffled as to why she said that.
It was a nice change. But I decided to do some more painting anyway. Just a wee bit.
“If you were anyone if Manhattan or Brooklyn, and you weren’t Catholic or Jewish, you were buried in Green-Wood. Everyone was buried there,” says Feldman. Founded in 1838, Green-Wood was one of the first “rural” cemeteries in the country, and with its beautiful landscaping, gently sloping lawns, and impressive sculptures, it was a huge tourist attraction as well. It is the final resting-place for more than a half million people, ranging from the noted to the notorious, and behind every gravestone is a story.
how much more will your heavenly Father give good things to those who ask him.
At a national level, government of the people, by the people, and for the people has been a myth for a long time. Maybe it always has been. Oh, the Americans have enshrined it in their constitution, and doubtless some still fondly believe that’s what they have, but there, as much as anywhere else, it’s meaningless; the masses are governed, and the wealthy elite govern. In the past, in other countries, it might have been an intellectual elite, but it’s always been an elite of some sort, almost always rooted in money.
I recently read an awesome article entitled, The Courage to be Patient. It is a directive to youth soccer coaches, and it highlights the discipline it takes to truly adopt the best way to develop young athletes.
Forerunners of a divine multitude,
(Never played this but didn't have another Q Game....)
You may also not be surprised to learn that when I was reading the book “Time Management for Manic Mums” I got stuck on the chapter that dealt with procrastination.
* Hamachi Sashimi Yellow. They adorn it with a creamy ginger vinaigrette, sea grapes and unique pressed yozu pineapple.
There was no time that Ponting looked more like the batsman who has dominated attacks everywhere in the world but India than when he brought up his half century with a classic cover drive.
It was a fun night...
This is the shrub.
Some real life teachers might take a lesson from that.
I'll be interviewing Signore London next Monday for Marvelous Middle Grade Monday. And he has very kindly offered a signed copy (plus a "super secret surprise item") to one lucky blog commenter.
How are we approaching God wrongly? When we abstract the characteristics of God in the way I have described, we are drawing from our human understanding of love, and power, and fatherhood, and applying those human definitions to God. The result is a vision of God that is composed of all the ‘best thoughts I can imagine’ about God. But whatever best thoughts you might have, they still fall short of God in His actuality. How can you, O Finite Human, capture or conceive even the smallest characteristic of an infinite God? If you had 100 pieces of information about God, how much more information would you need to reach infinity? If you had 1,000,000 pieces of information about God, how much more would you need to reach infinity? The gap between our human understanding and God, no matter how high we climb the ladder of knowledge, remains impassable.
All that was left was to assemble!
You see beauty you may have missed.
Special Teams
US Study Trip Meeting 9 – 2/11/11, 10am
If you ask any avid yogi why they love yoga so much, weight-loss and calorie burn would probably be pretty far down the list. While you don’t want to take away from the mind/body connection people flock to yoga to experience—admit it—you are a little curious how many calories your favourite yoga class is scorching. And if you are on a weight-loss plan, being informed on just how many calories you are expending can be the key to your success.
New tennis balls? Because on his morning walk he chased balls I hit with my tennis racket. Binned along with the tennis racket. And the dog walking shoes and the poop scoop and plastic bag collection. Because there will be no more morning walks.
Some is truly genius.
Our new basket ball court was opened by the Mayor and younger two were allowed to be the first few on! (probably because they have been glued to the area since it was announced!!)
Our hearts are full, our days joy-filled and our lives forever changed...all because of a year ago today.
(T)he problem with the other origin of the “good,” of the good man, as the person of ressentiment has thought it out for himself, demands some conclusion. It is not surprising that the lambs should bear a grudge against the great birds of prey, but that is no reason for blaming the great birds of prey for taking the little lambs. And when the lambs say among themselves, “These birds of prey are evil, and he who least resembles a bird of prey, who is rather its opposite, a lamb,—should he not be good?” then there is nothing to carp with in this ideal’s establishment, though the birds of prey may regard it a little mockingly, and maybe say to themselves, “We bear no grudge against them, these good lambs, we even love them: nothing is tastier than a tender lamb.”
My husband is out covering the arsonist story here in LA.
I had been taking things easy and just hanging out around the house with Dad and the littles, while Marty worked. It was a Friday afternoon and my phone rang. On the other end was my ER doctor, with the news that everyone dreads...
All this aside, I had a really fun time at a casino recently! We spent a couple of nights at a wacky place just outside of Palm Springs in celebration of a great friend's great big birthday. I think part of the reason it was such fun was that I'd had a little training on gambling behavior the previous week at that very same friend's most righteous house party.
Good morning, lovelies! And happy Monday! How was your weekend?
I wasn't just crying that night..........
So what do our kids really need from these years? Well, they need to learn a lot of stuff. Humans are wired to learn -- to be curious and to try to fit into the tribe. Kids left to their own devices in a rich (not necessarily "enriched") environment will learn. Just try to stop them. They constantly watch, listen, absorb, ask questions, think, space out, poke things, and try new stuff. Do we need to focus on teaching them particular things at particular times? If we grown-ups need to know something, we go learn it. Why should we set the schedule for them? Do we have some special knowledge that they will need a particular skill or bit of knowledge to fulfill some goal later in life? No, we don't. More importantly, no manner of assessment will guarantee that they will learn (really learn) anything we decide to teach them. We learn best when what we're learning is interesting, entertaining, fulfilling for us. We learn best when curiosity drives exploration and study, not when a syllabus and a class bell announce the next subject. As long as Joe and I have the luxury of being responsible for our kids' education, the best things we can do to prepare them for adulthood are to (a) introduce them to our world by sharing our interests and our daily lives with them, and (b) listen to them and help them find answers, resources, and new ideas in whatever direction their curiosity pulls them.
We need to stay focused on God. We need to trust in thee promises that we are told and know that God will follow through and be there for us. Just as He was to Daniel.
In those long gone days, many of the houses had no indoor plumbing. This was convenient during the day as we could easily run into any of the out houses without worrying if we were tracking in mud or dirt, something the aunts did not like for us to do, but at night, it was not so convenient.
Kaboom!
THE
She eventually fell into a pretty deep sleep and I was able to capture some sweet slumbering poses. I particularly love the ones in the bowl...she looks so content and peaceful that it makes me wish I could fit into that bowl myself. I would definitely curl up and have a nap.
You have changed in order to be free to make a whopping great fortune while your tiger scares the hell out of little old ladies and rivals. And yourself, for that matter. All self-made men and women are fettered to such companion, whether they choose to acknowledge his existence or not.
Over the years of being hunted for their fur, their numbers dwindled, but are now back up to a healthy 10 – 15 million across North America, including Canada.
greasy spoon called The Windmill; drinking coffee just like proper gangsters. It is my contention that Party Time's plan to surreptitiously photograph the fronts of peoples' Credit Cards is an inspired criminal strategy....It allows for the fraudster to circumvent the time limit imposed when actually tea-leafing a Credit Card – the time limit due to the owner realising the card's gone and ringing his bank to cancel it. I mean...you got the details off the front of the card, photographed, and memorised the 3-digit security number on the back. Cunt's not gonna know what's happened till he gets his statement in and that could be weeks away – by then we coulda bought up half the department stores in Belfast on the fucker's dime.
(1)Generalised or localised muscle fatigue after minimal exertion with prolonged recovery time.
I’m not proud of that.
I gently hand washed this after the party. It seemed to hold up well. However, I don't expect it to be an heirloom piece. I spent less than $10 on thrift store items and used a lot of spray paint that I already had. So considering the cost, I feel like I've already gotten my money's worth out of it!
It is dropped to rot in the greedy earth.
A: Jesse Blackburn is a young man who had the world at his feet: He was a world-class athlete, a star student, an All-American with a brilliant career laid out ahead of him. Then he was run down by a hit-and-run driver and left for dead. I did that to put an irreparable crack in the characters' lives, and in the story. I wanted Jesse and Evan to live with the effects of violent crime, in a way that would never disappear. They can't ignore it or forget about it. It's always there. So the story is about how they deal with the physical and emotional consequences. It's about how Jesse rebuilds his life, and they build their relationship, in the aftermath.
Chisum provides some interesting background information on the state of technology heading into the Benson decision:
Happy Days - Requiem for a Malph (1977):
And I might even tell you about some of the things I plan to do to you when you return to my arms. *insert evil grin here*
#225 Brayan Pena
The investigators found that the differences between the brains of research subjects who were meditators and the brains of non-meditators in the control group weren’t limited to a core region of the brain but instead involved large-scale networks of the entire brain, as well as limbic structures and the brain stem.
"No"
Surrender to the peace
We knew it was going to be a huge work in progress
Holy, potential Bishops ignored like leprotic cats
There's a little romance for those of you who love love, and while there were some PG moments here and there (not necessarily involving the romance), I didn't find them to be tacky or too much. I really liked our main protagonist, Sarah - she's very bright, and kind of makes me feel like a total slacker. I am definitely more motivated to learn some more languages than I was before I read this book, haha! I liked Anne and Sam as well, even though Anne got on my nerves just a little at some point. I don't know why exactly, because it's not that she was in any way inherently annoying. I think it is just that she held onto her initial denial of what was going on for longer than I felt was reasonable. I shouldn't really fault her for that, though, since, if I were in their situation, I would probably not charge ahead like Sarah and Sam, taking everything as it is from the second it's presented. As for Alexandros, I definitely developed a book-crush on him. What can I say? I have a soft spot for Mediterraneans, and all of this mysterious slayer-of-the-undead business just makes him that much more appealing.
No I don’t mean toilet papered, I mean Trigger Point rolling. Although, with teenagers in the house I have experienced both myself. So what is Trigger Point you ask? They are just the greatest self massage tools on the planet! In fact, so great that I called the company to become one of their first four Master Trainers. So what makes them so special? Well, I will tell you. They were designed by an elite athlete named Cassidy Phillips who was diagnosed with fibromyalgia in his 20’s. It would take him over 2 hours to get out of bed each morning. After trying many therapeutic modalities, the only relief he got was from massage. So he set out to design a self massage tool so he could take care of himself, because who can afford a massage everyday anyways? Trigger Point Tools are a similar concept to foam rolling only waaaay better!! These balls, and rollers, are so magical, everybody needs a set and they are small enough to travel with you anywhere. You will actually find me rolling against the wall in an airport to help unlock my hips and back before I hop on a plane to relieve the pain from my herniated disc. I don’t care that people are staring at me, they are just jealous that they don’t have a pair of balls like mine. Unlike a tennis ball, which will collapse under pressure or a baseball and lacrosse ball, which are too hard and could cause tissue damage, Trigger Point Performance Tools were designed to mimic a massage therapist’s hand to conform to the muscle within 5-7 seconds. The goal is to compress and release the myofacia that surrounds our muscles and creates tightness in order to increase range of motion and relieve muscular tension. It works so well that you may ask why I would support such a tool that could cut into my business. Maybe, but I came back to this field after doing medical sales to empower, educate, and motivate people to take care of themselves. I would rather my clients take charge of their health and see me for maintenance, than become dependent on me. Plus, if I help them, they will tell all of their friends and I will get more clients to help. How cool is that?
The April Hello Thursday was delayed until the first week of May. There were 5 new cartridges announced.
Even cricket is better than tennis, but that too now is trying to hurry summers along. Rather than being something akin to a metaphor for eternity, cricket nowadays is not the long slow days of nothing happening, interspersed with tea and rain that used to be, that it was meant to be.
The biggest positive for me here is the Pujols, which is not only a pretty nice card, but also knocks off 1/3 of my remaining wantlist for that set. I'm a fan of the designs of both the '04 Topps Tradeds and especially the ATFF, a set I really believe Topps should bring back.
I hope I can blog more on next year.lol
Born to a wealthy and privileged family in 1889, in one of the most exclusive communities in American history, Tuxedo Park, Dorothy Draper was the first to “professionalize” the interior design industry by establishing, in 1923, the first interior design company in the United States, something that until then was unheard of, and also at a time when it was
I always take tons of pictures of them.
Usage – Las Vegas is famous for its wild hedonistic night life .
"Yes I'm sure."
Congratulations! If you would please e-mail me your address so I can send you your Penguins of Madagascar gift pack, I will get that right out!
House Stuff: I guess the hamper we ordered is on its way, because they charged our credit card. Other than that, no progress. Sigh.
Conditions can make you love
I haven't worn red lipstick
Get ready for a big surprise.
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer.
Food is fun, comforting and sexy – just like a partner should be. Let’s just dig in.
The first thing we bought was a ready-made layout kit made by the manufacturer of the cabinets we were going to purchase. It included a large page with a layout grid as well as sheets of various assorted stickers in perfect scale to the grid. The idea was to lay out the entire space using the provided stickers for walls, doors and windows. Then using the stickers for all the standard-sized cabinets for that manufacturer, you were supposed to lay out the kitchen (including standard-sized stickers for appliances). Once the layout was to your liking, you could go to Home Depot and buy the cabinets using the product numbers on each sticker in your layout.
Another part оf the ultra setting would bе thе Direct-X compatible sound card thаt hаs motherboard capabilities іn delivering a high quality sound. These cards arе normаllу internal оr external and сan be attached tо a surround sound system for а ultra gaming experience.An active Broadband Internet connection іѕ nесеѕsary for normal and ultra settings.
The Earth is occasionally hit by these ejections, leading to amazing shimmering light shows.
Sometimes for me the enormity of the fact that I am composed of atoms that have existed (literally) for eons and will continue to exist long after I have finished with them puts me firmly in my significant/insignificant place.
when i need to protect someone.
The study is part of AAIA’s initiative to illustrate the automotive aftermarket industry’s widespread efforts on behalf of the environment. The information is presented in AAIA’s “Driving Toward a Cleaner Environment: The Automotive Aftermarket’s Green Story,” in the short video, AAIA Green, and in a Green Snapshot. For more information, visit www.aftermarket.org/green.
Spanish tapas and wine? ¡Si, Por Favor!
"College of Magical Knowledge" before WIPocalypse:
For the sock wars and family balls games, we took all of our pictures of all the walls, and all of our breakables off the tables. We put the vases in the cupboard or in the kitchen. We put the lamps on the floor when we play. We put pillows on the dangerous corners. We recognized that our home is our home, and that everyone's stuff is equally important - and that playing ball or having sock wars in the house is important for us as a family. In short, we make the environement suitable for the game, rather than make the game suitable for the environment. Sometimes, this is challenging if not impossible; I can't support throwing knives at each other or bricks at the windows, although we can help them find safer places or targets. But helping them suit their environment for their needs in a family-oriented, equal manner has far-reaching benefits. Don't take my word for it; take Kade's.
What planet does this man live on?
OWD asks someone talking at the back to quiet down.
Now we turn it over to you. Have you tried either and what do you think? Has Banana Republic surpassed Express with their new wovens, or does Express still hold the top spot? Perhaps you have another label in mind that trumps both. Let us know in the comments and in our poll.
11-28 Luxembourg, Luxembourg – Rockhal
met her second husband, Leland Hayward, the Broadway producer
She was the sickle; I, poor I, the rake,
I am also thankful for the many other role models in my life who have shown me the kind of mother I long to be. I was thrilled to find a Mother's Day card in my mailbox Friday afternoon from my sweet sister-in-law and friend, Roan. It could not have come at a better time! I am forever grateful for her love, prayers, guidance, and example.
Marcos loyalists demand hero’s burial for former First Lady
If the baby gets to nurse in the middle of the night -- for any reason -- what is going to be bad about that? Breastmilk is the best possible thing any baby can eat, and direct from mom it comes in a warm and loving embrace, a sense of being cherished, affirmation of the child being worthy of nurturing, and both physical and psychological comfort.
We didn’t exactly celebrate Mom. Sorry! We focused more on these fake mustaches on our fingers. Some great pictures were taken and the security guy at the airport appreciated the mustache fun.
Besides it’s still better than to be in a shelter, isn’t it furriends?
Prizes are picked randomly, so anyone can win! And better yet, you can send in your cards to be donated to children in one of seven hospitals. See here for more details!
I am a very focused person and was willing to give something time to work, but the opportunity to trade my own accounts was somehow very different. The process seemed so unstructured and deciding which indicator or system to use was very confusing. I could take 10 lifetimes and still never get through the myriad of information available related to the financial markets. I figured out pretty quickly that I wasn’t going to have 10 lifetimes to make trading work, nor the capital to survive even 1 lifetime unless I started to see some results.
The Pace Trials cost nearly £5 million pounds of tax payers’ money.
One thing greater than my strife
Thirdly…friends. Now, I have to be real with you. I don’t even have a lot of friends. Like every girl my age, I was bombarded by the ever popular show Sex & the City (and Girlfriends for the African American females.) I longed to have a life of fabulous and friends like Carrie. That is a TV show and movie. Plus, Carrie Bradshaw had a spending problem and couldn’t even afford a home. Is that really what you want!? You’re delusional Vicky D. Let’s get real. What’s not delusional is having a support system of girls who are there for you through thick & thin. I don’t have 3 friends who I do everything with persay, but I do have a few girls from each stage of life that I love to death. I know them from different stages of life: high school, college, post college and beyond! LOL They are each unique and very special to me. You’ll learn more about all of them later.
The digital world has made numbers a subjective measurement, which has both raised the importance of, and exploded, the idea of connection. And whether its using birds, music, or pictures of each other’s kids, it's more important than ever to find ways to connect people and build communities.
Wolf, a wiry Californian, regularly records around 20 of his own vital signs, and successfully applied this self-analysis to bringing his high blood pressure under control. In the future, Wolf suggests, self-tracking will no longer be primarily about treating illnesses, but instead will focus on maintaining health and increasing our enjoyment of life. “It is a trial that begins with one very important person: yourself,” he says.
So what makes your story intriguing? Can you turn that into a winning pitch? I'd love to hear yours!
Arminghall is traversed by the Seven Footpaths, a set of paths which link the city of Norwich with Upper Stoke. I was only a boy when my family travelled via the Seven Footpaths to Caistor Lane one Christmas. It was a good way to work up a Christmas appetite no doubt. I never managed to count seven footpaths, more like four, the others must have been swallowed up by the growth of the city. Since those times some of the paths have been marked by wooden sign posts, but even they are now old and may well have disappeared. Even where a pointer may still indicate a path, it points across a ploughed field. I doubt that many people have walked the Seven Footpaths in the 50 years since we did so, and even then it was an unusual thing to do.
The report published almost a week after forensic experts attended the autopsies and also re-visited the actual crime scene, reveals that there was apparently only one shooter, and that all three victims were shot at close range. According to the report both firearms, the .357 Magnum revolver and the .22-rifle were apparently used, but I suspect these preliminary conclusions were based on visual inspection of the gunshot wounds on the deceased persons.
Enjoy your Monday morning!
Here, the papers are Bo Bunny's "On the Go" series. On both cards my embellishments from the sketch are actual keys! I picked these up at Home Depot and was so lucky to find ones in the perfect colors to coordinate with my papers. I tell ya the creativity moons were aligned so properly for this! Well the cards are a bit hit so far and now I have more to make to meet the expectations of all the rest of them getting their licenses in the coming months!
I believe in one God, the Father Almighty, Maker of heaven and earth, and of all things visible and invisible.
"‘Her Body’ is more heart-breaking each time I hear it. A startlingly gorgeous piece on a person’s death being appropriated as a ‘theme park for ideologues’ and their body being turned into a metaphor."
Her water heater sits in her garage. Behind a truck load of stuff.
-before they can announce the first guy, lets go Cena/Cena sucks breaks out.
Women's 1500 - defending champ Maryam Jamal (BRN)cranked out a stunning 3:56.55! Crushed the field with a grinding last lap. 3:59.98 for Christin Wurth Thomas as she takes second place! Continuing her improvement and showing that she is not afraid to get in there and run.
Challenge: Think Happy! (happy birthday, something that makes you happy, a happy thank you - really anything): Use green, a stamp (I am not going to specify whether it's an image or a sentiment), and ribbon!
3 - Red Foley - Chattanoogie Shoe Shine Boy - 2:49
We've been having ridiculously nice & unseasonably warm weather here - the high today was 79! In March - in Minnesota! Not normal but you won't see me complaining =) So that's just one of my excuses why I haven't gotten more done lately LOL.
Today, I went for the power player. The all-powerful, all too easy to prepare, green lentil, weighing in at 9 grams of protein for lunch today. I had about 1/2 cup. Go for the full cup and thats 18 grams of protein. You won’t even have to eat a steak for dinner!
Fan you into despair! Have the power still
Krishna and Radha
-Available in 4 different colors (as in the picture above)
It was pretty shocking yesterday to see the complete listing of the 80-odd legal actions taken in Dublin’s High Court in 2010 by sub-prime mortgage lender, GE Money Ireland, but the list of actions this year initiated by NAMA is beginning to grow into the same ballpark. Yesterday the Agency lodged an application against two ofIreland’s best-known developers, the colourful John (Johnny) Ronan and the under-stated Richard Barrett together with their flagship development company, Treasury Holdings. The case reference is 2012/4092 P, there are two NAMA entities taking the action – National Asset Management Agency and National Asset Loan Management Limited, both represented by Dublin solicitors, William Fry. The presence of National Asset Management Agency as one of the plaintiffs is unusual and may signify there are matters of great importance at issue.
Everything and jalapeno? WTF?
What warmth and comfort are
I had hoped that calling ahead would put us somewhere first in line in the emergency room but no, we checked in and waited at least another hour before being seen. ”please pee in the cup” was the first demand to be filled. I retold our tale of the following 2 weeks to one nurse, then a doctor and finally a specialist that wondered why he wasn’t on a drop yet – my son was obviously dehydrated.
Speaking of the Yogurt Shop murders, the prosecutor in that case, Efrain De La Fuente, is running to replace retiring Travis County District Judge Mike Lynch presiding over felony cases. De La Fuente is opposed by a long-time Austin defense attorney David Wahlberg, who told the Austin Statesman:
Hamas Leader Khaled Mash’al Praises Sheikh Yousef Al-Qaradhawi for His Support of Suicide Operations and States: Holocaust Exaggerated, Being Used to Extort Germany, and Zionist Holocaust Against Arabs Much Worse
Griffin was reported to have run a 4.41 in the 40-yard dash at the combine. Reports came out that Luck didn’t have as strong of an arm as was thought. Theories have been floating around that Luck had been playing against relatively weak Pac-12 defenses (as if the Big 12 is any better). This still doesn’t get at the real reason why Luck and Griffin have switched places on a lot of peoples’ draft boards.
To be strong you must be flexible yet in order to be flexible you must be strong. Out of balance you break; out of balance the ability to remain fluid is lost.
Well, let me say this.
I just need to vent.
Raspberry Chipotle Barbecue Sauce
March 2012 - Page Loads 32,280 Unique Visits 21,456
Isaiah tells of a God whose awesome deeds are surprising. Isaiah offers us a bold promise that God is bound to act. It will be surprising and nothing that we expect.
and of course the old Samba stuff, both traditional street samba and
Hope you have all had a good weekend. Weather wise it has been glorious, lots of lovely sunshine. Went out for a meal last night. As it is my birthday on Tuesday my daughter came home from university for the weekend. We went to our local Indian restaurant and had a super meal. There were 13 of us there and we managed to see off 7 bottles of wine so a good night had by all lol.
This is more difficult than it sounds. Back home, I used internet job boards to find work, but in my experience as far as the Netherlands goes, searching for jobs online doesn't do you much good. My first steps after arriving here were to contact geological, engineering and environmental recruiters and after signing up with them, or never hearing from them I then contacted companies in these fields directly, even if they weren't hiring. This didn't work for me, but I felt it got my name out there at least.
So that only you and I enjoy with
I have only ever escaped London by car, train or aeroplane never by bike. This was going to be a first for me. The simple idea that a rivers flow could take me on a journey out of historic London and into the British countryside had me wishing the weekend would hurry itself along. I was also looking forward to having the company of my boyfriend. He was as keen as I was to break the boundaries of the M25 on the seat of a bicycle.
Summer vacation is almost upon us. That means I will have 3 kids home and looking for something to do! Every summer I plan some reading and math activities for my kids to keep them fresh and ready to return to school in the fall. This summer I have planned the following for reading:
Others have written that they find sharing a bag of chips romantic. Not on your nelly! I might share chips with a man at a later date but until I know that he always washes his hands when he’s been to the loo, there’s no way he is sticking his fingers into my bag of chips! Aside from which, who told him that it’s romantic to share a bag of chips on a first date? Why did he believe them?
The New Brown Bag Lunch ebook will be ready later this week. Just in time for back to school.
The reality is that we finally arrived at the Dawson City ferry area five hours later!
The pattern repeats itself. He either blames any problem on the Bush administration or he naively seeks to wish away the truth.
Since Johannes Gutenberg invented the printing press in 1436, there have been certain nagging, existential questions regarding the placement and style of typography.
If you go into the bathroom and look into the mirror with the lights off and the room completely black, and then say 'Bloody Mary' thirteen times, a woman will appear and scratch your face up/off.
White South Africans are sick, their minds have been consumed by a virus that resulted in them having one-track-minds that cannot see beyond their PERSONAL beliefs and PERSONAL interpretations of what they PERSONALLY believe is right or wrong in terms of religion.
i wanted the pink stuff
- Fields of flowers
The intuitive mind is a sacred gift and the rational mind is a faithful servant. We have created a society which honours the servant but has forgotten the gift.
The Stolen Bride: Tor/Forge hardcover, April 2012, 344 pages, cover art by Steve Stone. Tony Hays is an international journalist who also writes historical mysteries. The Stolen Bride is the fourth in his series of mysteries during the days of King Arthur. But the books are not fantasies——Hays assumes the Arthur legends were based on real people and places his stories in a historically accurate early medieval setting.
It’s a great way of exposing your best work to Watcher’s Council readers and Council members. while grabbing the increased traffic and notoriety. And how good is that, eh?
add 1 1/2 cups of sliced asparagus to the rice and 1/4 cup more cheese, stir, cover and bake 15 minutes more
Larryl shows him the heavy money pouch and the gold tinkles softly. Both guards relax a bit and they exchange some smalltalk. Suddenly the door at the bottom of the stairs opens and a man walks in, fully armored.
This is a LO I created for my Son's 2010 Halloween as Darth Vader. Since there were no pumpkins or halloween decor' around him in this shot, I didn't want to create a traditional halloween LO, so I opted to do a Star Wars themed one.
Well, I had intended to enter several challenges this week. It started with Emma's Throwback Thursday, always one of my favorites, in which the challenge was to use a heart from any older cartridge. So the wheels started turning. Then I saw that 365 Cards was having a "Romance" themed challenge. Hmmmmmmmm..... And then I saw that the Crafty Ho's were having a monochromatic color challenge. The Cuttlebug Spot was having a book inspiration challenge, and Stuck On You Sketches was having a sketch challenge. My mind was spinning, and I had what I thought was a great idea--which I didn't get finished for the Cuttlebug Spot challenge, but I did enter it into the others. I really liked the difficulty of making one project work for many challenges. This did not completely meet my expectations, but it does express the sentiment I wanted it to.
routine and every other detail to lose weight. Well
"Deal," I said.
Binned. Binned the lot of it.
So over all I had a lovely but damp day at Salford Keys, did a little shopping (all I bought were hair grips and a necklace showing my love of chocolate which I will post about soon I'm sure) and had a wander around the Lowry Gallery which there was an Annie Lennox exhibition on which was amazing so glad I dropped on it! I'm planning to go back and spend some more time in that section watching all her music videos projected on the wall! Hopefully I will be back to blogging more next week, with better pictures!
She's been stuck at 48 followers for a little while, which makes no sense, because she has a great blog with lots of fun crafting projects and recipes that I know you'll all love.
I looked at my face again. Exhaustion has taken its toll. The skin is patchy. The eye bags more pronounced. Perhaps puffy from the crying. Or the salty food that seems to soothe.
And they must do it without Clary. For Clary has gone into the heart of darkness, to play a dangerous game utterly alone. The price of losing the game is not just her own life, but Jace’s soul. She’s willing to do anything for Jace, but can she even still trust him? Or is he truly lost? What price is too high to pay, even for love?
I think it's quite a good piece of guidance for life in general, but it's certainly useful for those times when you suddenly notice that you're supposed to be writing a blog post for Saturday and you forgot to start thinking of possible topics in plenty of time.
I used a couple of laser-cut chipboards which I coloured using copic markers, and the butterfly chipboard was also clear embossed before adding a few pearls. There are 2 layers of lace on the card to echo the 2 layers of sheer frills in the dress, and a red flower finishes the card off.
:) but a good rarity.
nag
Supported by Ben Mason
Designers and dressmakers strive to create dresses that push the current styles and offer unique choices. The sad thing is that you can't find these great dresses in most stores. The stores around you will carry only the most popular items in hopes of a sale, but that doesn't help you find something that no one else will be wearing. You will also only find the most popular sizes, which means they could sell out of your size quickly or may not even carry it at all. Sherri Hill dresses and other similar dressmakers could change the way you shop for dresses, though.
Spotted: stylish trendsetters Diane Kruger, Kate Bosworth and Katie Holmes all rocking lived-in, brown suede ankle boots. Kruger put her best foot forward at Coachella (April 13-15) pairing her rugged boots with an assortment of short dresses. Bosworth opted for an even more casual look strolling around LA while outfitted in the Western-style booties, cut-off shorts, a baggy tank and a worn denim button-up. Finally, Holmes was snapped accompanying her daughter for a quick jaunt in NYC; sporting a colorful t-shirt, belted cardigan and skinny dark denim jeans tucked into a pair of her Suri-approved ankle boots.
"Campsis Radicans (L.) Seem Ex Bureau Trumpet Creeper." Natural Resources Conservation Service. United States Department of Agriculture. Web. 5 Nov. 2011: http://plants.usda.gov/java/profile?symbol=CARA2.
92. So Much Closer Susane Colasanti
The peanut gallery’s messiah du jour is Morgan Tsvangirai of the Zimbabwean Opposition Party. They delude themselves that if not for the megalomania of one man—Mugabe—freedom would have flourished in Zimbabwe, as it has in the rest of Africa.
Even though a church is automatically tax-exempt under Code Section 501(c)(3), the church still has a responsibility to operate under the Tax Code according to the law. No guidance under the IRS’s Regulations for exempt organizations is more important than the way a church is governed. There is a lot of latitude in church government but I suggest that you follow a few simple guidelines:
Tuesdays at the Castle by Jessica Day George (a royal family lives in a castle that has a mind of its own and is trying to protect them) ****
Amusingly, Linky’s picture is pasted above the famous sonnet beginning rather appropriately “A la nue accablante tu,” and as difficult to interpret as what might have been going through my model’s highly independent mind.
Good luck to everyone who enters.
Two notes about this one: Firstly, the “Friday the 13th sound effect” should probably be written as “ch-ch-ch, ah-ah-ah”. Secondly, right after I took this picture, I realized that having Jason brandishing a machete on my classroom’s chalkboard was probably too intense for anyone so I erased it.
The Body of the resurrected Christ was incomparably more spiritual than the incorrupt body of Adam before the Fall. Christ’s resurrected, spiritual Body was like the spiritual body that Adam was supposed to attain by ascending to God in Paradise. Likewise, the New Heaven and the New Earth will be incomparably more spiritual than the incorrupt creation before the Fall. Through Christ the New Adam, the renewed creation will be what it would have been if the first Adam had raised it to God.
¡hasta luegooo!
The President has been jetting around the country demanding that “millionaires and billionaires” pay their “fair share” of income taxes. Apparently, he didn’t get the memo. As the above graph, based on data from the Heritage Foundation, shows, the 1 percent-ers are already paying a lot more than they should be, 2.18 times as much to be exact. The same goes for the 2-5% (1.47x) and the 5-10% (1.09x). Also notable, the 10-25% group rakes in about 35% more income than the top 1%, but pays less than half as much in taxes.
I love Paris. I love my job. I love my husband. I love my friends. I love my family. I love my life. Not in that order.
Row 6) ch1, sc in first st, sc in fisrt st,* sc in stitch below next sc,(long sc) sc in next st, repeat from * to last 6sts, sc in last 6sts
A key theme highlighted in the report is the growing confidence, self-belief and commitment by Africans to move Africa forward, reflected in the substantial growth of intra-African investment. Between 2003 and 2011, there has been 23% annual compound growth in intra-African investment into new FDI projects. This growth has been accelerating, with the growth rate up by 42% since 2007
Birchermuesli
I look at my life
Runners - feel free to come out for your long training day.
I don't need fine wines, aged single malt whiskeys, rare cheeses, or any other obscure delectable delights for my tongue when I have the finely crafted words of brilliant writers.
I saved Daniel and Clara.
According to Owen Bradley, her Decca Records producer, the Four Star compositions only seemed to hint at the potential that lurked inside of Cline. Bradley thought her voice was best suited for singing pop music. The Four Star producers, however, insisted that Cline would record only country songs, as her contract also stated. During her contract with Four Star, she recorded 51 songs.
We were pretty tired by the time we left the restaurant and were eager to try out our capsules. The inn was very much alive when we got back. They had the internet on (it was free) and we got to check our email and facebook. We also researched what to do the next day. The shower was divided into individual stalls by curtains, but was very clean. They also had free tap water (its the little things in life). I watched YouTube on my Ipod (free wireless) before falling fast asleep (it was noisy at times as there are about 30 capsules on each floor and the door to the balcony was open to let cool air in), but I am a sound sleeper so it was fine.
Jesus thanked God for the little e.g. in the miracle of the multiplication of the 5 loaves and 2 fishes. Jesus thanked His Father for the little. He boasted in the little. Because of this, God’s power then manifested to multiply the provision.
CD #1 highlights include: “Ol’ Man River”, “Once In Awhile, “Always” and “Send For Me If You Need Me.”
Can other SPL teams do so? Probably not in enough numbers to stop it.
Called my old friend Schepman up to auction off the land
The thing is that we have spent plenty of time around livestock, pastures and crops, and yet we still like to have a little girly side. Maybe no matter how much you smell like a cow you can't hide you inner fashionista.
I'm sure very few bloggers have lives that warrant dressing for the red carpet let alone occasion to dress up every day. But fashion blogging is often about a challenge to try to dress better in spite of that. I guess there might be the purists out there that say if you're going to talk the talk than walk the walk. Should it detract from the post if the blogger doesn't strut out to get the milk in her carefully constructed catwalk look? What's wrong with showcasing the results of pure experimentation with an audience just as designers and stylists do in catwalk shows and magazine shoots?
We would have missed the finger numbing fun of readjusting the plastic bags over our sneakers as we plodded around the yard.
The problem with religious jackwagons is not that they’re religious. It’s that they’re jackwagons. If they weren’t religious, they would be some other kind of jackwagon. Is jackwagonry impossible to change? Certainly not. But trying to cure it by going for the religion is not in line with empirical evidence. There are too many of my fellow atheists who are reprehensible for me to believe that religious beliefs are a meaningful contributor to just being a really awful person. We as atheists should be smarter than that.
The true grid
It is difficult to find a wine, at a reasonable price that has all those qualities, in most cases I've had wine which is great, and I've really enjoyed it but it lacks either the aroma or length (the taste that lingers and keeps coming back).
Saison Dupont
Twine - May Arts
There’ll be no moon to light the nights,
We’re currently looking for placements of 6-24 months for more individuals and families, like Carolina from Chile, who has skills in working with children with disabilities and helping them grow in faith; and the Marroquin family, experienced evangelists from Guatemala.
Next, Xu Guan moved the large black drum back to the edge of his tunnel. He slid into the tunnel feet first and then pulled the drum back over the entry hole. The drum was just barely larger than the entry hole, but Xu Guan figured that it would hide his tunnel from all but the most intent searcher.
I plan to stop breast feeding in a month or two. I gave it my best shot, but ever since the Mastitis/Cellulitus incident my supply has been low. It got increasingly lower for whatever reason (LCs and OB are blaming PCOS), and right now I'm barely making half what he needs. I'm getting to the point where I feel like the negatives of this situation are outweighing any benefits. I'm frustrated. I've done Fenugreek, Goat's Rue, Mother's Love Special Blend, Reglan, power pumping... and I'm still only making about 2oz a pumping session. It really doesn't seem worth it some days. So my old goal was to breast feed until one year, but my new goal is to make it to three months... maybe four. I feel like there are just so many negatives to this situation right now though. I don't have any time, I feel like I'm always chained to the pump, I get frustrated easier because of that, I don't make nearly enough anyway, also it hurts, and I can't do what I need to for my own health. I don't want to quit, but at the same time I am beyond ready to.
833 Gardner C. Taylor Boulevard (formerly Marcy Avenue) (between Putnam Avenue and Madison Street)
omg - her face.
has released it on DVD and it's fantastic that I finally got a chance to see it after so many years. The print is interesting - fullscreen like most TV-movie from that time, but it also seem to pieced together from two prints. A couple of scenes has a different, lower, quality. That's okey for, because I want the most complete version and this obviously is that.
Mostly I reached this decision because The Tempest is a delightful play; I love Shakespeare’s late romances and it contains one of my favorite lines from the Bard. But more importantly, it is Shakespeare’s one work that may be considered an addition to the fantasy genre. Miranda’s character is certainly young (she’s fifteen), but she has a gentle heart and a fresh, untainted view of the world, which fits well with the meaning of her name: “worthy of admiration or wonder.” Her father is a sorcerer, and she is associated with art and magic.
Hock Seng’s an interesting one. He’s technically Malaysian, but has Chinese ethnicity and identifies himself as Chinese so I’m calling that Chinese culture. Hock Seng is a refugee from Malaysia, the only surviving member of his family after racial massacres. He works for a Western-owned factory and plots to one day break open the safe and head for the hills while he lets the world burn around him.
THE THREE LOVES OF PERSIMMON by Cassandra Golds Penguin Australia pbk.
Brisbane - what a blast - I had the best time :) :) :) What a beautiful city despite the very hilly roads and a GPS that took us a different way to and from the convention centre every day!!! It was wonderful to finally meet Lisa and Jen and Tiff from the Twiddleybitz Design team - I reckon our stand was the best one there - if crowds were anything to go by we won hands down!!!! The Design Team did a fantastic job and all day every day all we heard were exclamations on various projects! I didn't take my camera :( so hopefully a few that did willl email me some copies and I will load them up for you.
We are also working on establishing a good emergency fund and my work has a 401k match that we contribute to as well. So many people don’t even think about retirement right now, but we want to live the good life when we retire so we’re already thinking about it. Luckily Dan is great with money and helps keep me on track, even though it’s hard sometimes. So many people don’t live within their means (including the GOVERNMENT sheesh) and it just makes life harder and brings more stress into your life to live like that. This is a great youtube video called “don’t buy stuff you cannot afford”:
A new update to Dropbox allows users to transfer photos directly from digital camera SD cards and accumulate 3 more gigabytes of free storage online.
It's just two days to go before Greeks go to the polls to elect a new Government to steer the ship of state either back onto a steady path, or onto the rocks.
Left Hook Lager St. Patrick's Day Beer with Steve-the special release of our campaign mircrobrew!
When the music had stopped,
Here in North Carolina tomorrow is primary election day. We have already voted in the early voting place on hubbie's day off. I encourage everyone to get out and exercise your right to vote.
I’ve had several injections, every time they seem like a big deal. To some people I spose it would be a “whatever” sorta thing… I’d like to say it’s all routine by now – and by the 7th and 10th round of injections, I would be an old hat – but it just isn’t.
I should mention that the Tuesday we were away, we got some bad news. My great-grandmother, Eileen Boyle Caputo, passed away at age 99 on the day we left, Saturday the 6th of February. I wasn't very close to her, having only known her in her later years, but my mom was, and it hit her hardest. I don't think any of us really thought she was going to die soon. She always seemed like the Energizer bunny: you just expected her to keep going forever!
A civil servant grandee is emulating the repressive accents normally reserved to the enforcement crowd in the Police contingent.
Running out
* University of Southern California (USA)
This one of those beers that won't "wow" you, but will make you glad you had it.
"This is unbelievable!" the first man says.
Another main issue of sustainability is how a built environment can change and adapt to changing conditions. One of the main theoretical assumption of architecture in the 20th century was the power of the project to manage in itself the complexity of the future development of the city. The failure of many of those projects that have been realized shows us that we cannot tell in advance what will really happen…
What are your dreams?
* The emotional destruction and belittlement of a teenage girl
It's at this juncture I remember something very powerful.
We both chose the young cockerel for our main course. This dish (per person) consisted of two large breasts of cockerel and a cockerel leg served with green rice, avocado salsa and a paprika source.
Once healthy, Patterson was able to pitch an inning or two in these extended spring training games. Now he’s ready for Tacoma – and we’ll take him, he’s been outstanding here for two years.
During the month of May, I’m going to be posting a little on different, non-Christian religions. What do they really believe? Is it possible to believe in two religions at once? Can a person be a dedicated Christian while also adhering to Buddhist principles? What’s the difference between pagans, Wiccans, and witchcraft? And how do they all compare and contrast to each other?
I got NG and CG out of the car, and we went in search of a pen and some paper to write the BMW owner a note and to exchange insurance information. We walked into a diner, but the tall, grey-haired man in the green trenchcoat was standing inside. I didn’t want him to see the girls, so we ducked out of a side door into an alley.
population grew to a point where they demanded rights and representation on a par with humans and vampires. Instead, their leaders were summarily ignored, discredited, or otherwise rendered impotent. Væmpire gangs formed, menacing neighborhoods in major cities.
That evening was spent logistically planning for the surgery, and who would be where. He left me in the morning to go pick up the girls and his mom (who was staying with them at our house). They all met me in the waiting room for post-op, and then he and I walked with Tomas' isolette back to pre-op to say goodbye. That moment is so very, very hard. We've done it five times now, and it is never easy, but that first time was a huge test for us. How much did we mean it when we said we would put our faith in the Lord, and let go?
- If you love somebody, set them free. If they return, set them on fire.
Our standards are lowered and we become desensitized
Please read on…
So what happened to you?
I created using the "fuchsia crochet flowers and leaves" these flowers are quality work and such lovely colors. I also used the cricut cartridge Lacy Labels for the frame and butterfly.
From Text 12 the text moves on to other topics such as lunar time, common time, sidereal time, and then closes the book.
Where anger ended a soul
I noticed a few other blogs posting about this item, but none thought to properly highlight how hilariously awesome the slides are. The bold colours and simple graphic illustrations are wonderful to begin with, but as I mentioned above they are also punctuated with unusual sound effects, like “Ktang!”, “Sfoom!”, “Ftik!”, and “Wok!”. On closer inspection of the other bloggers’ sets, I realized that some of my slides have been printed irregularly, creating extra colourful scenes that are really quite striking.
OPt 4 purple.
When you have finished looking round the motor museum, make your way to the beautiful Palace House. Formerly the 13th century gatehouse to the Abbey, this magnificent building is still home to the Montagu family and whilst there is an element of ‘museum’ to it, there is still plenty to prove that it remains a family home. One of the many interesting stories you will be told is that up until the 1930′s (or thereabouts), Lord Montagu had a number of his cars housed in the entrance hall and under the stairs and it was only after his marriage that Lady Montagu insisted his growing museum was stored elsewhere!
33 And while he yet talked with them, behold, the messenger came down unto him: and he said, Behold, this evil is of the LORD; what should I wait for the LORD any longer?
For a long time, we have wished that we had a good way to carry ALL of our markers. I have a hard time when I travel, trying to get them to all fit in cases that are not too bulky, but also wouldn't break.
I had one other boyfriend who sported a turtleneck.
My background paper is the supreme Prima Reflections. I found some text on the web about various stitches and copied it into Word, converted the typeface to Old English and then copied it into Photoshop where I used an eraser of varying opacity to rub away some of the lettering before printing it to the right size for my project. Copying from Word into Photoshop really blurs the text and it is almost completely unreadable but one can pick out the odd word like "fabric". I'm a bit OCD and I prefer it when a text background bears some relationship to my project!
The warmth, very skin’ p essential oils and instead gives off skin satin the instance.
Just like all the many dedicated volunteers who have joined Run for Change since its inception, he believes that running or walking on a regular basis to achieve a personal goal is extremely empowering and with a little motivation and encouragement, the results can be life changing. Run for Change is a free running/walking group for those from shelters, recovery centres and low-income households in Vancouver. You can learn more from this special and inspiring video produced by Tetley .
People who try to buy something are not encountered with this connection problem, because if you press 1 for “sales” you are immediately connected to a sales person. But as you know the sales person can’t help you and starts to connect you again with the merry go round.
“According to the approver, he informed Dr Satpal that the pregnancy was to be terminated as the girl was unmarried…. Dr Satpal and his wife Dalbir Kaur took Harpreet Kaur to the delivery room while she was still unconscious and. Dalbir Kaur and Dr Satpal administered medicine to Harpeet. They told him that the process would be lengthy and they had injected medicine and abortion might take place within 24 hours and 72 hours….”
Of course, you need a cup of coffee to get you out of those rainy day moods and bring in the sunshine. I actually needed two cups of coffee. I started at Vintage Fare in the Nugget Mall. They always have a experimental coffee drink. I think todays was called Banana Split. I didn't try it. I bought my usual soy latte with sugar free caramel. It sounds like I'm on a diet. Nope. Just getting older.
Thursday, August 9th–I went to another MHMR appointment. I was told I had been diagnosed as Bi-Polar, Level II.
And the problem is that the Forgotten Realms novels tend to work in a manner familiar to the game system so the paladins are usually good and trustworthy, the clerics god fearing folk, and most of the people with views and outlooks that encapsulate the best of what we currently think we are. In short, it can be damn boring at times.
Peter Buckley Hill’s response on behalf of the PBH Free Fringe was a little more complicated and surprising. He replied:
I am the diamond glints on snow. Io sono il bagliore della gemma sulla neve.
Emerging powers like India, Brazil, Russia and South Africa are increasingly challenging Western dominance and are working more with each other and with China in doing so;
Bob – Walt, Todd Clarke talked about the Aerotropolis event, you were there, and can you give fill us in on what he talked about?
I am setting up to give the goat milking lessons. We needed to clean up the yard anyway, so it has been good motivation. Still have a lot of stuff to do in the front yard, but am moving forward on that.
The first time, I felt like I didn't have any paint-brush-technique at all. Every brush stroke was put on hard and thick, and the end result looked childlike. I was happy with it for my first time painting, but it was no bueno for art that I'd like to display in mi casa. (comprende?)
As I mentioned in yesterday's post, my sister M. and I featured regularly in the singing at the ANL Xmas parties. We dutifully learned our songs in elementary school chorus class to prepare for the annual Christmas choral program. We were pretty good! Our little eight- and six-year-old voices were sweet and earnest. One year at his office party, my dad asked us to sing our favorite Christmas carol. After a brief conference (in which I argued for my favorite, a beautiful song in a haunting minor key), we sang this lovely song:
Why do we not have signs and wonders today as a gift of God? The Jews seek after a sign and the Lord said, “Except ye see signs and wonders, ye will not believe”. (John 4:48) But God is no longer dealing with the Jews. Rather, during this administration of grace we are to “walk by faith, not by sight.” (2 Corinthians 5:8)
The top is a water media beginning drawing on "Yes" watercolor canvas (love these canvases!) 24"X39"
Donna
14. Even if She Falls
Cauri Forces for an Emerging Scotland (borrowed from Benin)
NYT story by: Walter Gibbs
